Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
Number of Reviews
43

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Most science fiction movies, good or bad, have a single look and
set of characters that they use throughout the entire production.  But
not Luc Besson's THE FIFTH ELEMENT.  Every five minutes, some totally
new character or special effect is introduced.  This makes for a highly
involving and mesmerizing film.  Although the film is incorrectly being
marketed as the "STAR WARS for the 90s," it does have some of the
imagination of the STAR WARS saga.  Where it differs, is that THE FIFTH
ELEMENT never takes itself very seriously.
     The current trend among filmmakers is to engage in a battle with
the studio's finance department with the filmmakers' goal being to
spend the maximum amount possible on special effects.  Whether the
effects are worth the money becomes irrelevant; the effects become an
end in themselves.  THE FIFTH ELEMENT puts some sanity in this trend by
spending every penny wisely, producing some of the most dazzling
effects in a long time.  If you are envisioning a depressing BLADE
RUNNER motif for Besson's vision, think again.  THE FIFTH ELEMENT is
described in the press kit as showing a non-apocalyptic future, and Dan
Weil's sets are suitably colorful and inviting.
     Typical of the innovativeness is its rendering of traffic in a big
city in the year 2259.  Rather than heavy traffic on the one street
level, the airborne cars operate on numerous but carefully controlled
parallel logical surfaces.  Keeping the ROGER RABBIT looking taxis in
line, are police cars with the cops in Jean-Paul Gaultier's uniforms
reminiscent of RoboCop.
     Among all of the visual spectacles is a story and some excellent
acting as well.  Bruce Willis, who can be terrific but has been in so
many dogs like COLOR OF NIGHT that I have begun to dread seeing his
name on the marquee, plays the starring role of the taxi driver and
ex-government agent Korben Dallas.
     One day, a newly made woman with orange mop hair and some Band-Aid
strips for clothing drops into Korben's cab, and I do mean drops.  She
speaks only a sing-song style of language that baffles Korben.  ("I
only speak two languages," he tells her, "English and bad English.")
Her name is Leeloo (Milla Jovovich), and she has just been created from
a strand of DNA from the remains of an alien spacecraft.  In 48 hours a
fireball of evil will consume the world unless she, being the perfect
fifth element, and stones representing the other four are combined in
some long lost temple.
     The screenplay by Luc Besson and Robert Mark Kamen has enough
complexity to make following it somewhat of a challenge, but never so
much as to lose the audience.  Working through it becomes an
interesting diversion, but all eyes stay glued to the screen to see
what will happen next.  THE FIFTH ELEMENT is more a feast for the eyes
than the mind.
     The film is filled with cartoonish shoot-'em-up violence, Willis,
as one of many shooters, plays a much more lovable character than he
does in the DIE HARD series.  His enjoyment of his character transfers
easily to the audience.  The chemistry between Korben and his sidekick
Leeloo pulsates with comedic and romantic energy.
     Beautiful Jovovich speaks with a Yoda-like, sparse syntax.  ("Me
fifth element," she reassures Korben.  "Supreme being.  Me protect
you.")  With her quirky mannerisms and speech, Jovovich steals most of
her scenes.
     Gary Oldman plays Zorg, the leader of the bad guys on planet
earth.  His has a deal in progress with the thing about to destroy the
planet.  Oldman plays his part as total camp.  With a heavy southern
accent, he spouts one aphorism after another, including the classic,
"What doesn't kill you makes you stronger."
     The funniest character in the entire movie is the black
transvestite and talk show host Ruby Rhod (Chris Tucker).  Ruby Rhod
with his leopard skinned dress, his cylindrical hairdo, and non-stop
mouth provides a perfect complement to the fast paced action.
     All of the details, right down to the barbecuing of the ugly
little parasites on the spacecraft before the flight, are carefully
orchestrated with maximum imagination.  The press kit says that Besson
first got the idea for the story when he was a teenager and has been
developing it ever since.  I believe it.  The result overflows with
energy and creativity.
     THE FIFTH ELEMENT runs 2:07 and is worth every minute.  It is
rated PG-13 for brief female nudity, cartoonish violence, and a little
profanity.  The film would be fine for kids say 9 or 10 and up.  I had
great fun at THE FIFTH ELEMENT so I recommend it to you strongly and
give it *** 1/2.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Scott Renshaw
(Columbia)
Starring:  Bruce Willis, Gary Oldman, Milla Jovovich, Ian Holm, Chris
Tucker.
Screenplay:  Luc Besson and Robert Mark Kamen.
Producer:  Patrice Ledoux.
Director:  Luc Besson.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (brief nudity, sexual situations, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  127 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw
     Here, I had thought to myself as I watched a television spot for THE
FIFTH ELEMENT, may be the acme in hyperbolic idiocy.  In one of those
exclamation point-filled critical blurbs which tend to accompany
pre-release advertising, someone was touting THE FIFTH ELEMENT as "STAR
WARS for the 90s."  I could only shake my head, especially considering it
had only been a few months since we had actually seen STAR WARS for the
90s.  Then I saw THE FIFTH ELEMENT, and I was forced to acknowledge that,
in a perverse way, the statement was completely accurate.  Like STAR WARS,
THE FIFTH ELEMENT is essentially a fairy tale, an archetypal Good Vs. Evil
story dressed up in high-tech trappings.  And like many films of the 90s,
it's so busy and loud that the compelling elements in the story tend to
get lost.
     In a prologue set in 1914, we learn the secret of the mysterious
"fifth element."  It is a weapon created a benevolent alien race called
the Mondoshawan to protect humanity from an evil force which threatens the
universe once every 5000 years.  In 2259, it is time once again for the
Mondoshawan to deliver the weapon, but their ship is downed by agents of
the sinister industrialist Zorg (Gary Oldman).  Only one key to the weapon
survives, a tissue sample which is replicated to produce a mysterious
woman called Leeloo (Milla Jovovich).  When Leeloo flees the authorities,
she ends up in the back seat of Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis), a retired
military man now driving a cab.  Dallas becomes infatuated with the
strange and beautiful passenger who seems to be on everyone's most wanted
list, little expecting that his connection with Leeloo will lead him into
a battle in which the fate of humanity hangs in the balance.
     Whatever else one might say about THE FIFTH ELEMENT, you have to give
this to Luc Besson:  there is nothing he won't try to keep the audience
watching.  THE FIFTH ELEMENT is a blitzkrieg of images, moods and messages
which never lets up and never gives you a chance to get bored.  Scenes of
multi-level 23rd century air traffic provide a vertiginous backdrop for
chase scenes; the production design and costumes (by Dan Weil and
Jean-Paul Gaultier, respectively) are ablaze with color.  Comic relief is
provided by Ian Holm (as a cleric entrusted with the protection of the
fifth element) and Chris Tucker (as a flamboyant radio personality), as
well as by periodic phone calls from Dallas' kvetching mother.  You've got
your good aliens, your bad aliens (the shape-shifting mercenary
Mangalores), your sex (enough to push the PG-13 envelope), your violence
(ditto) and your romance, all tied up in a big shiny anti-war message
before the finale.
     If that sounds like a lot to take in, that's only because it is.  As
undeniably entertaining as individual moments in THE FIFTH ELEMENT may be,
the film never feels like a cohesive narrative with a distinctive sense of
place.  The most memorable creations of fantasy and science fiction, from
THE WIZARD OF OZ to BRAZIL, created worlds which were not just unique but
uniquely real -- every place, character and event were of a piece.  Besson
doesn't create that kind of world, one where you feel transported to
somewhere you've never been.  There are plenty of vivid details in THE
FIFTH ELEMENT, like Dallas' one-room-does-all apartment and an airport
filled with garbage, but they don't add up to anything truly intriguing.
Things happen for the sake of a momentary laugh or gasp rather than for
the creation of the film's internal universe.  It's not a specific future;
it's The Future, impressive but generic.
     It's nice to have sly performers like Willis, Oldman and Holm on
hand to make THE FIFTH ELEMENT's relentlessness somehow forgivable.
Milla Jovovich also does sharp work as Leeloo, doing a riot grrl spin on
Daryl Hannah in SPLASH.  Indeed, there are enough of the right elements in
THE FIFTH ELEMENT that you can't help but wish that they had been put 
together better.  This is a story about heroes, villains and the battle
between Good and Evil where the hero's quest is unclear, the real villain
is given just enough personality to make one threatening phone call, and
the climactic battle is over in a literal and figurative flash.  THE FIFTH
ELEMENT moves, all right, but it moves frantically, like the wired mugger
who accosts Dallas in one of the film's more amusing scenes.  I kept
thinking about how that character might have written THE FIFTH ELEMENT
after an all night bender of Jungian mythopoetics and the 23rd century
upper-of-choice.  That's "STAR WARS for the 90s":  Joseph Campbell on
crack.

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     Here's a topic that will be debated on the newsgroups for the rest
of the summer:  is Luc Besson's spectacular sci-fi action/comedy/ love
story the most visually arresting film of the decade?  Could be.  Think
BLADE RUNNER meets BRAZIL in this magnificently multi-colored, multi-
cultural vision of the 23rd century.  Every image is an eye-popper and
not just the flying taxies or futuristic cityscapes.  Costumes, make-up,
even the smallest set decorations are stunning.  And yet, the special
effects-- the most seamless blend of mattes, models, and computer
animation that I can recall-- never once threaten to overpower the
narrative.
     Yeah, there's a plot.  Former fighter pilot-turned-New York cabbie
Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis) saves the life of an orange-haired beauty
(actress/model/recording artist Milla Jovovich), who is actually an
alien super-weapon, once stored on Earth, then removed from Earth, then
*returned* to Earth, to save the Earth from an approaching, planet-
sized, super-duper-evil-and-with-a-cherry-on-top menace.  So far?  Now,
to be activated, she (it?) requires the presence of four sacred stones,
which she doesn't have, and which a villainous industrialist (Gary
Oldman, bucktoothed and brandishing an outlandish Southern accent) is
also trying to get.  Got it?
     Based on a story that Besson started when he was sixteen, THE FIFTH
ELEMENT is likely to be the most cryptic of the summer blockbuster
wannabes.  (Actually, it's a French film that's been several years in
the making.  Does that qualify as standard summer fare?) Only the
slightest explanation is offered for the movie's major events, though,
admittedly, anyone with even a *modest* sense of sci-fi can extrapolate
what's what and which end is up.  The smaller story details, however,
are another matter.  Besson and Robert Mark Kamen's screenplay relies
heavily upon coincidence and that's all fine and dandy until you try to
think about it.  (I tried to make detailed sense of the plot and track
who was where and how they got there and almost had a brain hemorrhage
in the process.)
     Okay, so you may not understand even *half* of the story.  That's
fine.  THE FIFTH ELEMENT entertains in so many, many other ways.  Nearly
every character, for example, gets their turn at playing comic relief.
(So much comic relief that some scenes border on slapstick.) Ian Holm,
the ass-biter from BIG NIGHT, is very funny as a high priest who's also
the alien's contact person on Earth.  Later scenes with Gary Oldman are
often a howl, while latecomer Chris Tucker is a hyperactive scene-
stealer as the flamboyant radio personality Ruby Rhod.  (Imagine, if you
can, a cross between Dennis Rodman and the Artist Formerly Known as
Prince.  And then try not to scream.)
     At the end, Besson attempts to get serious with statements about
war and violence and man's bottom-line need for love.  The resulting
shift in tone, however, is too abrupt and turns the finale into a
fizzle.  (The sequence also feels rushed and the accompanying special
effects are hardly special.  This is a movie that needs a *big* finish,
which we don't get, and which may be on purpose.) I suspect that Besson
intended to end on a different note.  Maybe something more sentimental
than visceral.  Maybe a tug at the heart instead of a kick in the 'nads.
Had he paid more attention to plot comprehensibility, and not required
the viewer to work *quite* so hard to play along, we might've even felt
it.  

Author
David N. Butterworth
French director Luc Besson's films ("La Femme Nikita," "The Professional")
have often favored style over substance.  With "The Fifth Element," Besson
does his previous entries one better, sacrificing narrative coherence for
a visually remarkable future world that leaves you breathless, if a little
confused.
It's no surprise that the film looks so good.  French comic book creators
Moebius and Jean Claude Mezieres guided Dan Weil's impressive production
design, and iconoclastic fashion designer Jean Paul Gaultier is
responsible for the outrageous costumes (although one might argue that the
carrot-haired Milla Jovovich displays a strategic *lack* of costume in
several of her scenes).
The story, on the other hand, is one that Besson himself threw together
as a teen.
Bruce Willis plays Korben Dallas, a New York cabbie who's reluctantly
recruited to save the world by securing the mysterious fifth element.
Part of the puzzle emerges in the form of Jovovich's bio-engineered
supreme being, Leeloo, who drops into Dallas' airborne taxicab and
provides new definition to the phrase "a perfect fare."
In this classic and classy Good vs. Evil yarn, ubiquitous British bad-guy
Gary Oldman plays corporate despot Zorg.  Oldman churns out yet another of
his puffed-up madman roles, sporting an American drawl that renders most
of his dialogue unintelligible.  Zorg's lizard-like alien henchmen vie
with Dallas to unearth four sacred stones--representing earth, wind, fire,
and water--which, when brought together with a fifth element, can either
save the world or destroy it, depending on what side of the universe you
woke up on.
This 23rd-century actioner culminates at Fhloston Paradise, a
intergalactic cruise ship of sorts, emceed in living color by Chris
Tucker's effeminate Prince-ly pop diva, Ruby Rhod.  How Besson worked him
into this script is anyone's guess, although his hysterical mincing and
shrieks of "Oh my God!" get funnier with age, especially during one of the
bigger shoot-em-up sequences.
Ignore the hokum that is at the center of this film and marvel at its
eye-popping sets, outrageous costume designs, and down-to-earth
performances from Willis and Jovovich.  While the logic of the storyline
leaves a lot to be desired, "The Fifth Element" satisfies as sheer
spectacle.

Author
John Beachem
Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis) is an ex-fighter pilot in the 23rd century who 
now flies a cab. His life takes a sudden turn when a beautiful young woman 
named Leeloo (Milla Jovovich) falls into his cab. Leeloo is a perfect 
entity, sent to Earth to fight the ultimate evil, which comes every five 
thousand years. Four groups are searching for Leeloo: Priest Vito Cornelius 
(the excellent Ian Holm), whose line has assisted in the fight against evil 
for centuries; Jean-Baptiste Emmanuel Zorg (the wonderful Gary Oldman) and 
his flunkies, who work for the ultimate evil; an evil warrior race known as 
the Mangalores, who were betrayed by Zorg; and the Earth government, led by 
the ever uncertain President Lindberg (Tom "Tiny" Lister Jr.) and his chief 
General, Munro (Brion James). Now Korben and Leeloo have to meet up with 
Cornelius, find four sacred stones needed to fight the evil, and get back to 
Earth in just a few days or all life in the universe will be destroyed. 
Along the way Korben will meet such peculiar characters as a cross-dressing 
radio host named Ruby Rhod (Chris Tucker), a galactic Diva named Plavalaguna 
(Maiwenn Le Besco), and a mugger (Mathieu Kassovitz) with a very interesting 
hat (don't ask, it has to be seen).
"The Fifth Element" is not a movie designed for all tastes. Viewers will 
most likely be divided into two groups: those who don't like their movies 
far-fetched and ridiculous, and those who love their movies to be comically 
bizarre (I fall into this category). The first group is going to loathe this 
movie because it represents all they detest in cinema. The plot (despite my 
rather confusing description) is child like in its simplicity. The 
characters are really nothing more than cartoon characters given human form; 
and all the movie's events are so ridiculous these people will no doubt be 
hitting the stop button after about thirty minutes. The other group is going 
to have an absolute blast. These people won't care about how ridiculous the 
movie is, so long as it entertains with fantastic visuals and off-the-wall 
humor. Is "The Fifth Element" entertaining? It is, quite possibly, the most 
flat-out entertaining movie I've seen this decade. It has no qualities one 
would associate with a great film, but if that's what you're looking for 
when you watch this movie you've obviously heard nothing about it. Rather 
than giving a deep, meaningful, Oscar worthy (you know, boring) picture, Luc 
Besson ("The Professional") instead chooses to give us a movie which 
promises to be just one thing - fun. "The Fifth Element" delivers on this 
promise in spades.
Dramatic acting is obviously not going to be of supreme importance in a 
movie like this, but comic acting is all important. Bruce Willis does quite 
a good job as the jaded Korben Dallas, dead-panning nearly everything but 
occasionally letting just a trace of amusement at his surroundings leak out 
(watch for his scene with the mugger; it's too funny for words). Milla 
Jovovich delivers a very amusing performance since she spends over half the 
movie speaking in gibberish. Word has it she actually made up her chattering 
language as she went along. Chris Tucker's ("Friday") performance is 
something of an acquired taste. When he first showed up on screen, I'll 
admit, I was rather shocked; but as the film went on, his character grew on 
me (maybe like fungus, but whatever works). The two actors who truly deliver 
outstanding comic performances are Gary Oldman ("Lost In Space") and Ian 
Holm ("Brazil"). Oldman hams it up like you've never seen as the 
multi-zillionaire Zorg. Zorg has a limp, a southern twang, a bizarre 
wardrobe, and an even stranger haircut. In the hands of anyone else, this 
character would have been a pathetic failure. Oldman actually manages to 
make Zorg likeable enough that a small part of you wants to see him get 
away, if not win. Ian Holm displays some of the best comic timing I've seen 
from an actor, well, anywhere. The way he delivers some of his lines is 
nothing short of perfection (one of my personal favorites was Ian Holm 
saying, "We're going to save the world my son." Korben responds with, 
"You're um, heh, gonna save the world?" Holm says, in an exasperated tone, 
"Yes!").
"The Fifth Element" is one of those marvelous movies which contains scenes 
that will stick with you for days, weeks, possibly even months afterwards. 
My favorite scenes were Leeloo's reconstruction in a futuristic (though very 
peculiar looking) laboratory; Korben's cab being chased by the police 
through the futuristic city; and the Diva's scene where she sings a 
beautiful (though very alien) opera while Leeloo fights a horde of 
Mangalores. Those first two I mentioned show Besson's visual imagination in 
two very different ways. The scene where Leeloo is being assembled is 
something quite extraordinary. It shows her skeleton being assembled 
quickly, piece by piece, then muscle and tissue being created over it, and 
finally skin being created. It's a remarkable scene in a remarkable movie. 
Korben's car chase gives us a chance to see most of Besson's futuristic 
city, and it's a sight to behold. The city is comprised of massive 
skyscrapers, surrounded by row after row of flying cars, going up as far as 
the eye can see. The scene with the Diva singing her opera while Leeloo 
beats up the Mangalores is exquisitely filmed (I must have re-watched that 
one scene five or six times). It combines Leeloo's martial arts style 
fighting with the singing flawlessly. Again, none of these scenes are going 
to win any major awards, but they're ever so much fun to watch.
Those who have seen Besson's work on "Nikita" and "The Messenger" know he is 
one of the more erratic directors in Hollywood. "Nikita" was a suspenseful 
tale which bordered on masterpiece, while "The Messenger" was quite the 
opposite. His work on "The Fifth Element" is far closer to that in "Nikita". 
One of Besson's trademarks is his frantic pacing throughout the film; this 
didn't work in "The Messenger", but it works perfectly in "The Fifth 
Element". The movie runs 126 minutes, which should have felt like an 
eternity, but with the combination of Besson's quick pacing and constant 
laughs, it feels more like 45 minutes (I'm not kidding). The soundtrack to 
"The Fifth Element", by composer Eric Serra ("Goldeneye"), is one of the 
film's strongest points. It's such a bizarre mix of different types of music 
(everything from something which sounded Jamaican during the car chase to 
beautiful instrumental music at the film's conclusion) that it could have 
sounded awful, but each song is somehow perfectly suited to its scene. I'd 
recommend the movie to anyone who likes their movies more than a little on 
the strange side and give it four and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Author
James Berardinelli
     THE FIFTH ELEMENT uses one of the newest tricks in the science
fiction motion picture handbook:  perform a visual and aural assault on
viewers in the vain hope that they won't notice the lack of substance,
logic, and intelligence.  For a few recent examples of where this tactic
has been employed, check out STARGATE, INDEPENDENCE DAY, and JUDGE
DREDD.  THE FIFTH ELEMENT, the summer of 1997's first big-budget
disappointment, is right at home in such company.  A lot of money was
spent on this film, but $100 million doesn't guarantee a good product. 
Maybe someone should have thought of spending a few more dollars on a
better script.
     Going into the film, I was guardedly optimistic.  As a result of
what I'd seen in the two-minute theatrical trailer, visions of BLADE
RUNNER danced in my head (I guarantee that no one in their right mind
would make such a ludicrous association after seeing THE FIFTH ELEMENT). 
And the director, Luc Besson, is a well-respected artist whose short-
but-impressive resume includes such international hits as LA FEMME
NIKITA and THE PROFESSIONAL (LEON).  I figured that if anyone could
handle the task of putting together a rousing science fiction adventure
with Bruce Willis in the lead, it was Besson.  Alas, such is not the
case.
     What can I say about the storyline?  There's not much there, and
what there is, doesn't make a lot of sense.  If you see THE FIFTH
ELEMENT, do not, under any circumstances, attempt to reason out what's
going on.  In general, science fiction tales play fast and loose with
reality, but here, it's so flagrant that even a moment's intelligent
consideration of what's on the screen will shatter any hope of
suspending disbelief.
     The goal in THE FIFTH ELEMENT is to save Earth from a gargantuan
evil that's hovering somewhere beyond the fringes of the solar system,
blasting space ships as it waits around for forty-eight hours so our
heroes can destroy it before it turns the planet into a cinder.  Nothing
can stop this nearly-omnipotent enemy (which looks like the Genesis
planet from the STAR TREK movies) except The Fifth Element -- the most
powerful weapon ever devised.  Things aren't straightforward, however,
because the Fifth Element is actually a girl who can't speak English
(Milla Jovovich), and she's missing four key stones without which she
can't do her job.  Pretty soon, there's a whole rogues' gallery of
characters looking for the stones:  an ex-government operative-turned-
cab driver, Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis), a new age priest (Ian Holm), a
megalomaniac (Gary Oldman), and a bunch of bunch of ugly looking aliens. 
The quest, which starts on Earth during the twenty-third century, takes
us to an outer space vacation resort where the stones are supposedly
hidden.
     THE FIFTH ELEMENT is populated by all manner of flashed, bangs, and
booms.  New York City, circa 2200, has been rendered with eye-popping
splendor by the effects wizards at Digital Domain.  (Check out rush hour
in the future if you think it's bad now!)  Bright colors -- reds,
oranges, and yellows -- are in evidence everywhere, from Bruce Willis'
outfit to Milla Jovovich's hair.  And Eric Serra's throbbing,
cacophonous score tests the limits of theater speakers.  On a purely
visceral level, it's impossible to deny that THE FIFTH ELEMENT has an
impact. 
     When it comes time to discuss the rest of the movie, however,
there's not much to talk about.  When a wisecracking actor like Bruce
Willis and a hammy performer like Gary Oldman are reduced to ineffectual
bystanders, there's a problem.  Willis and Oldman don't have much to do,
and, when they're on screen, they fade into the background, dwarfed by
the special effects.  Willis, whose John McLane is the DIE HARD series,
is used to taking center stage, but he can't compete with the visual
busy-ness of THE FIFTH ELEMENT, and that makes him a pretty dull hero. 
Meanwhile, with her fiery hair and occasionally-revealing costumes,
Jovovich makes an impression, although her effectiveness has little to
do with acting and less to do with dialogue (she doesn't have much to
say).  Only Chris Tucker, who plays an insanely energetic, over-the-top
talk show host (a loquacious Dennis Rodman in outer space) manages to
hold his own amidst the digital chaos, but his outrageousness starts to
wear thin after about two minutes.
     I will give Besson some credit.  He never takes things too
seriously, which is a good idea, because a somber version of THE FIFTH
ELEMENT would have made it a candidate for the year's Bottom 10 list. 
The director, working from a comic book-type script that he co-wrote
with Robert Mark Kamen (and which bears a certain resemblance to one of
the segments of HEAVY METAL), injects a ton of offbeat, sporadically-
effective humor into the movie, frequently causing THE FIFTH ELEMENT to
cross over the line into self-parody.  This unique approach kills any
possible sense of adventure or suspense (the numerous action scenes are
obligatory and perfunctory, and never remotely exciting), but it at
least offers something unusual.
     Once THE FIFTH ELEMENT's assault on the senses starts to wear off,
it's easy to become restless.  After all, in keeping with the "epic"
sweep demanded by such an obese budget, the film had to clock in at over
two hours, even though there's no excuse for a movie with so little
going on to last for so long.  At least the payoff is worthwhile in a
campy sense.  Where else can you see sweat rung from a handkerchief
become integral to saving the world?  Besson may have misfired with THE
FIFTH ELEMENT, but at least he does it with flair and a sense of humor.
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 

Author
Shane Burridge
McDonald's must be more than pleased with their product placement in
this lavish science-fantasy.  Not only are they shown as still being
in business at their fly-thrus in 2214, but the film is so heavily
decorated in red and yellow that by the end of it you'll be wondering
if it wasn't all some huge, sly, subliminal advertisement, and that 
the elusive 'fifth element' is actually McDonald's Secret Sauce.
Fortunately, I like red and yellow, I like science-fantasy, and I like
Luc Besson: he showed modest-budget visual flair with his early film
SUBWAY and big-screen visual flair with THE BIG BLUE (You can call it
THE LITTLE BLUE SQUARE if television is the only way you've seen it). 
In THE FIFTH ELEMENT he outdoes himself - not since Terry Gilliam's
BRAZIL has there been a film crammed with such visual bravura. 
Whether it's the costumes by Jean-Paul Gaultier, or the set designs by
Jean "Moebius" Giraud and Jean-Claude Mezieres (who turned out
hundreds of drawings), or the bizarre hairstyles and weird creatures,
the look of the film is astonishing, and it has surely met Besson's
vision as he conceived it.
THE FIFTH ELEMENT starts with the most well-worn of sci-fi ideas, that
of the link between Ancient Egypt and extra-terrestrials - but it is
delivered with such aplomb that it looks almost brand new.  Similarly,
the rest of the film operates on the simplest of premises.  In fact it
is so basic, and its conclusion that 'love conquers all' so trite,
that it is practically beyond reproach - Besson is more interested in
orchestrating his capricious storyline than providing a mindblowing
concept.  It works, because his enthusiasm for this project is so
pervasive (in every scene, in every new camera angle, in each new
gimmick) that you can't help share his sense of enjoyment. The cast he
has assembled also gets into the spirit.  Bruce Willis reprises his
reluctant-hero role for the part of Korben Dallas, a cab driver (or,
more accurately, pilot) on the skids.  He has a chance meeting with an
alien envoy (Milla Jovovich) that in turn leads him to an agitated
priest (Ian Holm) and a venal company director (Gary Oldman). 
Curiously, none of these people are responsible for his involvement in
an impromptu mission (to save the world, what else?) even though they
are all destined to meet again at the conclusion.  The four characters
are as wild and diverse as the four elements that they are in search
of, and just when you think the cast couldn't get more eccentric, an
egotistic, motormouthed DJ (Chris Tucker) is thrown into the mix. 
Everyone is playing it for laughs, including Besson, who indulges in a
welcome change of pace from his recent harder-edged stories.  After
two films about professional killers I was wondering if Besson had
lost his quirkiness: now I look forward to seeing his next production.
 If it's as surprising a choice as this one, I won't be disappointed.
There are several reasons to enjoy THE FIFTH ELEMENT, but a
significant one is the fact that we were allowed to see it without
being subjected to months of marketing hype beforehand.  Could it be
that studios have finally figured out that word of mouth is the best
advertising of all?  The only drawback now will be enthusiastic film
reviews (such as this one) that will have you expecting more than the
film can deliver.  So just forget everything I said.  And tell all
your friends.

Author
Walter Frith
Comments on this review may also be sent to wfrith@icom.ca
'THE FIFTH ELEMENT' IS PRIMARILY A 'STARGATE' WANNABE
Next to comedy, science fiction is probably the most difficult and often
misfired form of filmmaking there is.  The key to it is to make it somewhat
believable even though you know all along it isn't and people have to relate
to their movie characters to truly enjoy two hours of leisurely time spent in
a movie theatre.  The 'Star Wars' series worked because the trilogy gave us
characters you could truly root for and characters you truly loved to hate.
 The 'Star Trek' series has worked so well because of it's mystical and
intellectual profile not enjoyed by everyone but certainly by its loyal
followers who have contributed more to that side of pop culture than
practically any other on film.  Television's 'The X-Files' works
magnificently because of its central theme of government deception and
conspiracy which is certainly a reality to anyone with common sense and its
FBI connection has characters both very human and very vulnerable.  
The Egyptian connection.  It was used as the central plot of 1994's
'Stargate' starring Kurt Russell and James Spader.  The Egyptian connection.
 It is duplicated in 'The Fifth Element' which is a wasted and tiresome
science fiction creation looking to establish new rules for that genre and it
fails miserably.  
In 'The Fifth Element', the story begins in 1914 Egypt where historians are
tracking ancient carvings in a desert structure believed to be the sign of
mankind's destruction on Earth as an evil alien entity will eventually
annihilate the planet.  The opening scene has alien creatures in large
mechanical outfits that look curiously like Alice the Goon from the old
Popeye the sailor comics.  The ancient wall carvings also indicate that a
FIFTH ELEMENT next to the other four which are earth, wind, fire and water
will act as a defender to prevent this destruction.  The story then jumps
three hundred years into the future to New York City and this prophecy begins
to take shape.  The police officers of the future look very much like the
creations in 'Judge Dredd' (1995) which was a laughably bad action film
starring Sylvester Stallone.  'The Fifth Element' has Bruce Willis playing a
loserly cab driver whose career was once in full swing as a high profile
military man and now the military wants him back to save the world (the plot
gets trivial and tedious here) and Willis looks more like a needle in a hay
stack than he does a leading man as he is surrounded by visually striking
sets and effects which despite their convincing nature, drown out the
characters from developing into anything more than cardboard cut outs.  A
priest (Ian Holm) is also central to the plot as he discovers that through
generations in his family of passing down a secret legend that a fugitive
from justice that Willis has rescued is none other than the fifth element
(Milla Jovovich) which is an alien life form created by man as an alien/human
hybrid.  Destiny, it seems has brought them together to save all of human
life on Earth.  Oh, brother, is this hokey or what?! 
The film takes on a moronic imitation of not only 'Stargate' but 'Blade
Runner', 'Close Encounters' and almost any science fiction theme you can
imagine.  Its climax is predictable, bogged down with unfunny humour and
protracted excitement.  Other members of the cast include Gary Oldman and
Chris Tucker.  'The Fifth Element' is directed with a wooden hand by Luc
Besson who should not attempt another run at science fiction but rather a run
out of the movie business altogether as it will be hard to redeem himself
after this movie masquerading as art but coming off as trashy cloning of
films gone by.  One of 1997's most disappointing films to date.     
Visit Mr. Frith's 'Movie Reviews' section of 'The Review' at
http://www.arrowweb.com/review

Author
Michael Dequina
The Fifth Element (PG-13) *** (out of ****)
The cryptic teaser trailer has been unspooling in moviehouses for
quite sometime now: "IT MU5T BE FOUND."  So what, exactly, is The Fifth
Element?  After seeing Luc Besson's ambitious, much-shrouded-in-secrecy
science fiction fantasy, I could not help but be let down by the actual
answer, which is not nearly as exciting nor clever as one would think.  But
what is far from a letdown is the film as a whole, a wildly imaginative
feast for the senses that does what all the best science fiction films
do--create a universe unlike any other presented on the silver screen.
The biggest irony of The Fifth Element is that the one thing that
has been kept under such tight wraps--the actual storyline--is the most
conventional, dismayingly so, element (pun intended) of the film.  Speaking
in the vaguest possible terms, the basics of the plot are as follows: in the
year 2259, a great force of evil threatens to consume the earth, and only
the four elements--earth, wind, fire, and water--united with a fifth element
can stop it.  Figuring into all of this are New York cabbie Korben Dallas
(Bruce Willis); a shady, Southern-drawling entrepreneur by the name of Zorg
(the hilariously hammy Gary Oldman, picking up where he left off in Besson's
The Professional); a priest (Ian Holm); and a mysterious creature named
Leeloo (Milla Jovovich).  All of the pieces come together in a tidy and
somewhat underwhelming--and unsurprising--fashion, but there is no denying
that this basic story holds some intrinsic interest.
What remains interesting and exciting, however, after brief glimpses
is the fascinating world Besson has created with production designer Dan
Weil, director of photography Thierry Arbogast, visual effects supervisor
Mark Stetson, and the crew at Digital Domain.  The look is absolutely
mesmerizing right from the opening moments to the last.  The frenzied
cityscape of New York, with its vibrant day-glo colors, tall buildings
penetrating high into the clouds, and the swarm of cars, cabs, and other
vehicles flying through labyrinthian skyways, is absolutely breathtaking to
behold, especially in a wild car chase sequence early on in the film.  But
it would not have been a completely captivating vision if the people
inhabiting the settings weren't equally as interesting, and are they ever.
In addition to the exotic menagerie of alien creatures that populate this
world, from bulky robots to dog-like Mangalores, the humans are outfitted in
costumes by eccentric designer Jean-Paul Gaulthier, best known for creating
Madonna's pointy bustier get-up in her Blonde Ambition tour.  Gaulthier's
outlandish creations, such as a number worn by Leeloo made entirely out of
white straps, feel more at home in Besson's futuristic vision than on any
fashion runway in the world; they add to the sense of otherworldliness about
the film.
While Besson's bold vision is the biggest virtue of the film, it
also could be its biggest obstacle to reaching a mass audience.  For all its
imagination, certain things about the film may be a bit too quirky and
bizarre.  I really do not know what middle America will make of the most
outrageous character of the film, Ruby Rhod (Chris Tucker), a flamboyant
disc jockey who makes Dennis Rodman look conservative--he makes a raucous
entrance dressed in an animal print dress, sporting a blonde hairdo in the
shape of a hair dryer, speaking in high pitches at rapid fire speed.   At
first this character's hyper energy is funny, but the act wears out its
welcome very quickly.  Not irritating, but just as strange, is a musical
number by blue-skinned alien chanteuse Diva (Maiwenn LeBesco), who
sings--and dances--an aria that is an unlikely blend of classical opera and
techno.  The tune, as with the entirety of longtime Besson collaborator Eric
Serra's innovative score, is haunting, but it is also completely jarring.
Then there are the campy touches of humor Besson and co-scripter Robert Mark
Kamen sprinkle throughout, which too often are silly and forced; a comic
sexual encounter between Ruby Rhod and a flight attendant is highly
distracting and not very funny, to boot.
The story's weakness shines through in the climax and conclusion of
The Fifth Element.  While still visually and aurally spectacular, the events
detailed are not as exciting nor powerful as they should be.  The big,
serious dramatic climax was met with more than a few snickers, and it
ambitiously strives for a profundity which the film had not even begun to
work toward.  As such, at the end there is a sense that there was something
bigger at work here, that there was still more left to be said about this
story and these characters.  This suspicion was confirmed by Besson himself,
who told me in the lobby following the screening (imagine that, the
filmmaker watching the film with the "enemy"--the critics) that what had
made it to the screen was really just the first half of the lengthy original
Fifth Element screenplay and that the second half--now titled Mr. Shadow--is
still waiting to be made.
Still, despite the story problems, The Fifth Element is an artistic
triumph for Luc Besson; rarely does a filmmaker's original vision come to
the screen in all its audacious, undiluted glory.  It is a fascinating
example of how of one artist's fervid imagination can transport an audience
into an intoxicating fantasy world generally seen only in dreams.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
mrbrown23@juno.com  |  mrbrown@iname.com  |  mst3k@digicron.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html

Author
Michael Redman
Climb into the back seat and get ready as Bruce Willis takes us on one
hell of a cab ride. The first of the major science fiction films of the
summer hardly gives you a chance to breathe as the action keeps on
a-comin'.
In 1914 Egypt, archeologists are investigating a __major__ find when the
mother of all space ships pulls up outside the temple. Out of the
floating megalith waddle insectoid aliens in copper battlesuits. They've
come to retrieve the supreme weapon stored on Earth for 5,000 years in
the care of generations of priests. With the upcoming war, this planet
is no longer a safe haven for its own protector.
Three hundred years later, the ultimate evil in the guise of a flaming
planet is streaking its way towards its goal: destruction of just about
everything in the universe. Sensing that this may not be in the best
interest of said universe, our friendly aliens are returning the weapon
when they are ambushed by the not-so friendly droopy-eared dog soldier
aliens. When their ship crashes into the moon, there is only one
"survivor" on hand.
Through a high-tech cloning technique, the hand is reconstructed as the
consummate weapon which turns to be babe deluxe Milla Jovovich. A couple
of minutes later she takes a dive off a several hundred story NYC
building busting through the roof of Willis' floating taxi.
Willis, ever the die-hard, takes on the mission and goes up against
fascist industrialist Gary Oldman as well as the bizarros from outer
space and a huge fiery catastrophe. There's not a second to lose: the
end of the world is in a matter of hours and his driver's license has
been revoked.
The film is so dense with things to look at that you'll never catch them
all. The run-down city of the future owes much of its look to
"Bladerunner", from the vertigo-inspiring view down through the multiple
levels of air traffic to even a friendly Asian food vendor. There are a
million things going on in every scene and the effects are top rate.
Much of the design is by French illustrators Jean "Moebius" Giraud and
Jean-Claude Mezieres. Responsible for some of the most innovative early
"Heavy Metal" stories, Moebius' influence is apparent in some of the
more fantastic elements. The alien battlesuits are dazzling and the
blue-skinned alien diva is magnificent. Even the priest's goofy hats are
straight out of his graphic novels.
Willis is his usual hard-nosed rough and tumble kind of guy. When he
gets to Fhloston Paradise, a floating resort, you know to expect a big
shoot-out. The film doesn't disappoint. The lobby of the hotel turns
into one of the most explosive huge gun battles you've seen. Through all
the destruction, falls and bruises; the taxi driver maintains his sense
of humor, firing out wisecracks as often as bullets.
Jovovich is indeed the ultimate fantasy. A flaming red-head who moves
like a cat and fights like Bruce Lee, she speaks an unworldly language,
is powerful and independent yet vulnerable. Dressed in revealing thin
spandex bandages, the dazzling beauty is prone to dropping her clothes
at any given time. The archetypal male dream.
Oldman struts his stuff with a pronounced limp and his half-shaved head
covered in a plastic dome while holding court in a depraved southern
accent.
Possibly the most bizzare character in the film is Chris Tucker as radio
personality Ruby Rhod. A combination of Dennis Rodman and Little
Richard, Rhod's mouth runs a mile a minute. When he first enters the
movie, it's an unwelcome intrusion of camp, but as time goes on the DJ
develops into the perfect foil for Willis.
Like many recent filmmakers, Director Luc Besson ("La Femme Nikita") has
appropriated bits and pieces from other films. You'll see "Star Wars",
"Star Gate" and half a dozen other "Star" films as well as the obvious
"Die Hard" and "Bladerunner".
Although I'd have preferred a more original plot, this is the first film
in years that I wanted to see again just a few days later. It's
difficult to recommend an effects film much higher.
[This appeared in the 5/22/97 issue of the "Bloomington Voice",
Bloomington, Indiana. Michael Redman can be reached at
mredman@bvoice.com ]

Author
Steve Kong
Bruce Willis has got a strange on and off movie career. Usually, it's in the 
off position. But, once in a long while, he'll have a good film. The 5th 
Element is one of the latter. The commercials which ran for the movie, 
initially, promised, "The Star Wars of the '90s." A hard name to live up to.
Willis plays a retired space marine type in this movie. His character's name 
is Korben Dallas. Dallas has now retired and lives in a nice small apartment 
in the mid-23rd century. A great evil in space is about to kill every living 
being on Earth. There seems to be no way to stop it. At least that's how it's 
seen by the government. A priest knows better. There are the four elements, 
which are in the form of bars. Then there is the fifth element, a being that 
is the catalyst for the weapon to stop this great evil. The only problem is 
that the aliens that were transporting these elements were shot down in space. 
The only thing recovered from the crash landing site was a portion of the 
fifth element. With this portion, they use a super-computer to spin up a new 
fifth element being. The fifth element is played by the beautiful, and oddly 
red headed, Milla Jovovich. From here the fifth element "drops in" on Korben 
Dallas, and they with the priest are off to find the other four elements.
The story in The 5th Element is not too strong. What is strong in this movie 
are the special effects and the set design. It is the vision of the future 
that is put into this movie that sets it apart from other mediocre sci-fi 
movies. The visions of the future that are presented are of the caliber of 
those of "Blade Runner" and "Metropolis." Though not as dark as those 
presented in Blade Runner, the city in which Dallas lives is large, and the 
hover car chase early in the film is something to awe at. The other sets, 
including a futuristic cruise liner, Zorg's office, and the apartment building 
in which Dallas lives are also places to awe at. Along with these beautiful 
places are the costume design. The police have the best outfits, large, bulky, 
with a large lamp over the right side of their chest, and gun holstered above 
the left shoulder.
The 5th Element is a movie to be seen, literally. The sights in this movie 
outweigh the story. The story itself is not too bad, it's enough to keep the 
movie going along, but it is the presentation of the future that should really 
be seen in The 5th Element.

Author
Eric C. Robinette
Starring: Bruce Willis, Milla Jovovich, Gary Oldman, Ian Holm, Luke Perry
Written by Besson and Robert Mark Kamen 
Directed by Luc Besson.
"The Fifth Element" is a dumb, comic-book level story obsessed with it's
look and effects. That's why it's so much fun.
Much has been made of the fact that Luc Besson dreamed up this sci-fi
eyeful as a teenager, and he goes to great pains to prove it, throwing all
kinds of sights and sounds at us with exuberant glee at the expense of
character and plot.  The movie's all the better for it.
Too many sci-fi epics make the mistake of asking the audience to take them
seriously, to bear in mind their heavy-handed morals that are more
tiresome than touching. By wearing it's emptiness on it's sleeve, The
Fifth Element works effectively as a pure shot in the arm that energized
me for two hours and nothing more, and that was fine with me.
Indeedf uge plot is, and aple,lain with a southern accent (Oldman).
That's pretty much it. For some people, this won't be enough to chew on,
but I found the whole confection pretty tasty because I could  feel the
enthusiasm that Besson feels by bringing his lifelong fantasy to the
screen.  Most of the players seem to be having fun right along with him,
too. Though Willis is using his annoying smug mode, it actually works here
as counterpoint to the wild-goings on around him. Jovovich, amazingly,
rises above having been in "Return to the Blue Lagoon" with an energetic
and even affecting performance. Chris Tucker is also fun to watch as an
overhyped DJ on helium, Ruby Rhod. The only real disappointment here is
Gary Oldman who has his menacing stare in place but also uses a weird
"soutvern boy" acaent that setms out of pnace and diletes his vilBainy.
The oook of the eilm has ofte  been comp ved to BladeoRunner, witi its
cast, growded city oapes, but Ufe similarieses end thermv The techios at
Digitac Domain have created bright, fast-moving, landscathat match
tirector's en and are theithesis of B Runner's foding skylinehe chase sce
hrough the vcal levels ors in the cis a dazzlingvel I won't o forget.
Ufunately, Bess enthusiasmvntually proo be too mucf a good thing, and the
picture begins to collapse under its own weight at its too-long
conclusion.  Besson throws so many action scenes and digital effects at
the audience that the movie wears itself out, rather than end with a real
wallop.
Up until that point, though, The Fifth Element works as one of those rare
movies that asked me to check my brain at the door, and I felt no dumber
for having done so when it was over.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
The Fifth Element (1997)
Bruce Willis, Gary Oldman, Ian Holm, Milla Javovich, Chris Tucker, Luke 
Perry, Brion James, Tommy "Tiny" Lister, Lee Evans, John Neville. 
Directed by Luc Besson. 127 minutes.
PG-13,  3.5 stars (out of 5 stars)
Here's the bottom line. If you love sci-fi thrill rides, go see "The 
Fifth Element" right now. Don't read the rest of this review until after 
you've seen the film and don't let your friends tell you about the movie. 
Just go and enjoy the most spectacular piece of mindless eye candy to 
come along in years. 
I really should stop right there, but if I did there would be a big blank 
spot on this page and I wouldn't get paid, so I suppose I should proceed. 
When I was little, I watched "The Jetsons" a lot. The writing was awful, 
bad enough to make "The Flintstones" look good by comparison, but that 
didn't matter. I just loved watching those anti gravity cars whizzing 
through the air past futuristic buildings. As an adult, I trotted off to 
every sci-fi film that came to town, yearning to see a realistic 
depiction of the kind of world in which the Jetsons lived. There was 
"Logan's Run,"  with its horribly fake looking models of a futuristic 
domed city. Then came "Star Wars," which did show a futuristic town, but 
the hover-cars were cheesy and the buildings looked like pueblos. The 
"Star Trek" films gave us glimpses of San Francisco in the future, but it 
was always the same shot; a panorama including the Golden Gate bridge and 
a couple of flying cars. The shot was tantalizing, but just didn't cut 
the mustard. Then "Blade Runner" hit, with its beautifully realized 
vision of a futuristic decadent Los Angeles. The massive motion picture 
billboards, flying cars, and post-punk city streets were dazzling, but it 
still didn't satisfy my adolescent Jetsons fantasies. After "Blade Runner,
" most sci-fi flicks tried to copy the same look, or simply avoided city 
scenes altogether.
"The Fifth Element" is my Jetsons wet dream come true. We get a long, 
breath-taking look at New York in the 23rd century, with loads of 
knockout shots of flying cars in intricate traffic patterns whizzing past 
massive futuristic buildings. I drank in every moment and wished there 
was some way I could move there.
What's really great is that those stunning cityscapes are just a tiny 
part of the film. From beginning to end, "The Fifth Element" fills the 
screen with one incredibly imaginative scene after another, all presented 
with high style, lots of action and a great sense of humor. Starting in 
1914 Egypt and quickly moving to the mid 23rd century, director Luc 
Besson ("The Big Blue") gives the audience a visual feast at breakneck 
pace. "The Fifth Element" is flat-out the coolest sci-fi flick since 
"Star Wars."
You may have noticed the rather juvenile tone this piece has taken. It is 
quite deliberate. Sci-fi springs from that 15 year old kid that lives in 
all of us. Great sci-fi requires an epic (and usually pretty silly) story 
involving the fate of worlds; with cool aliens, tons of killer special 
effects and a villain whose name starts with the letter Z. "The Fifth 
Element" delivers on all counts, and throws in some good acting as well.
Bruce Willis plays our hero, a cabby with a colorful past. A couple of 
years ago, some other movie critic came up with the Bruce Willis Rule, 
which is very simple. The shorter Willis' hair, the better his acting. 
That rule has held true until now. Willis has a pretty good head of hair 
this time around, yet delivers a straightforward, quite charismatic 
performance. He even knocks off lines like "I only speak two languages; 
English and bad English" without hamming it up. Gary Oldman plays the 
evil Zorg in freaky clothes and hair, while giving his character's 
presence a nice twist. When he makes his first sinister appearance, you 
expect a deep, ominous English accent. Instead, Oldman delivers his lines 
in a halting Arkansas drawl. The effect is disconcerting and very 
effective. The radiant Milla Javovich casts an otherworldly spell as 
Leeloo; the key character in the epic master plan. 
"The Fifth Element" breaks up the action with some broad comedy, ranging 
from a stocky Police matron in a Princess Leia cinnamon bun hairdo, to a 
interplanetary deejay whose presentation style is more flamboyant than 
Little Richard. The film contains loads of other treats, but you don't 
want to read about them here. Just forget about being an adult and let 
that raging 15 year old inside you loose. Haul ass to a theater with a 
great sound system and have a field day with this epic, goofy beaut of a 
movie. I'm going back as soon as possible, and I swear that I will never 
watch those damn Jetsons again.

Author
Lewis Butler
What can you say about a movie that shows a ring of red traffic lights
hovering in space?  THE FIFTH ELEMENT has the feeling of a comic book come
to life, and I mean that as a compliment.  There is a lot here that has
been done before, but never this well.  The film spends a lot of time
getting the little things right and assumes you'll go along with the
overall silliness of the main plot.  And you do.  The whole thing works
somehow.
There are references throughout the film to other movies, and there is a
whole 1930's Buck Rogers/Flash Gordon feeling to the whole epic.  The main
plot line is trivial and not worth going into here, what works best is the
overall presense of the film.  I was reminded of Steve Rude's artwork for
many of the scenes, and the entire sequence on the cruise ship could have
been stright out of the comic book NEXUS.
Gary Oldman turns in a wonderful performance as a psychotic power hungry
servant of evil (Mr. Shadow). And everyone else in the movie does what
needs to be done.  There is a particular performance that deserves
recognition, the role of the outlandish Dennis Rodman-styled DJ is
outstanding.  I don't know who the actor is, but he turns in a wonderfully
comic performance.
The special effects, of course, deserve their praise.  Some people might
dislike the comic-book look to some of the mattes and some of the city
scenes, but I found the whole thing quite appropriate.
Distribution of this message by Microsoft, its subsidiaries, or its
software shall constitute a violation of my copyrights.  Microsoft may
license copyrights to my messages, for distribution only, for the sum of
$1,000 US per week.
--
| kreme@cerebus.kreme.com   1015 South Gaylord, Denver, CO 80209 #100   |
|      WWW URL      \              ">http://www.nyx.net/~kreme>          | 
| [303/722-2009] Vox \ Sometimes, after a lighting storm, I can see in  |
| [303/777-2911] Data \ five dimensions.  -- Cornfed Pigg               |

Author
Marty Mapes
*** (out of 4)  The trailers for The Fifth Element make it look like it
tries very hard, perhaps too hard, to be cool and stylish. The
futuristic setting and the backflipping scraggly girl invite a
skeptical comparison to Blade Runner.
In fact, the movie does have some elements of Blade Runner. It also has
some from Die Hard, Brazil, Star Wars, and Stargate. It sounds like a
big confused jumble, but actually it has its own internal consistency
and look. It is almost immediately engaging and engrossing.
After an introductory scene in Egypt, 1918, the movie jumps to the 23rd
century.  A black hole of Evil threatens humanity. Attempts to destroy
this Evil with force result in the growth and strengthening of the evil
body.
Four stones from the early Egypt sequence, plus a perfectly engineered
human, the Fifth Element, are needed to banish the darkness and death.
The good aliens, the golden robot ducks, are the keepers of the stones
and of the Fifth Element. When they learn of humanity's impending doom,
they come to the aid of the Earth, bearing these five components. On
their way to Earth, they are shot down by the the evil mercenary
aliens, "destroying" the stones and the Fifth Element in the fiery
wreckage.
The human government is able to salvage a piece of the Fifth Element
from the wreckage and regenerate the perfect human using DNA from the
mummified and stone-encased piece of shrapnel. The human reincarnated
from the Fifth Element is Leeloo, and she escapes from the clutches of
the scientists so she can go off in search of the priest she's been
programmed to find.
She falls into the arms of Corben Dallas (Bruce Willis), a
down-on-his-luck space cab driver, an ex-space military man kicked out
of the space army who now lives alone with his cat. (In the last Besson
film, The Professional, the hero lived alone with his plant.). The two
end up on a search for the stones so that they can vanquish the evil
black hole.
Working against them is Jean-Baptise Emmanuel Zorg (that's
John-the-Baptist, Jesus, Zorg, played by Gary Oldman), who wants to
steal the stones and use them for evil and darkness. (Chaos is better
for the economy, you see.)
The plot sounds rather ridiculous, but The Fifth Element is so engaging
and has such integrity of style, that I was never bothered by the
cartoonishness of the plot.  This is a positive example of solving a
problem by throwing enough money at it.
Several factors make this movie much better than it sounds. First, the
visual elements of this movie are interesting, and the filmmakers went
all out. The sets are great (the scientist's chamber), the costumes are
great (the police officers, the aliens), the special effects are good,
and these are cartoonish by the same amount as the plot, which allows
them to cohabitate in the same movie.
Second, this movie is good, fun, escapist entertainment. The movie has
a little humor and camp -- not too much to distract from the action,
but enough to keep you watching for little jokes. If you haven't seen
it yet, pay attention to Dallas' cigarettes, or look for visual
"quotes" from Star Wars. There are lots of clever details packed into
the movie.
Finally, the editing (by Sylvie Landra) was superb. Besson and Landra
used some cross-cutting techniques both to cleverly link scenes and
also to transition from one scene to the next. The cross-cutting (as
well as the "regular" straight cutting) kept the movie's pace nice and
brisk.
The one factor that nearly everyone disklikes about this movie is the
character Ruby Rhod (played by Chris Tucker -- rhodamine is another
shade of red).  Ruby is a flamingly shrill, annoying DJ, ten times
worse than Howard Stern and Rush Limbaugh combined. Many people say the
movie would have been better without him, and I'd have a hard time
disagreeing.
Nevertheless, it is refreshing to see a science fiction movie with
space scenes and interesting aliens that is not part of some
established Star (fill-in-the-blank) series or based on some
pre-existing comic book. Apparently, Besson wrote the story for The
Fifth Element when he was a teenager, and he is just now coming back to
it.
This movie is not as heavy as Blade Runner or as insightful as Brazil,
but incorporates a lot of the more fun elements from both. The result
is a movie that's less substantial than either, but a lot more fun.
Check out more current movie reviews at
http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Eric G. Scharf
"Buckaroo Banzai" with ten times the budget and one tenth the plot.
Despite several dire reviews and some wry personal criticisms, I felt
obligated to go see this, the first "summer movie" of the season. And
although I don't exactly regret seeing this movie, I do wish I had managed
to pay only $3.75 for the privilege.
"The Fifth Element" is remniscent of "Buckaroo Banzai" in that it drops
the audience straight into the action and rushes along without bothering
to explain odd details. But where "Buckaroo Banzai" told an interesting
(or at least novel) story with minimal reliance on special effects, "The
Fifth Element" spends millions on effects to dress up what is essentially
a drug-running plot from a "Miami Vice" episode. "The Fifth Element" makes
exactly zero (or negative, if you count the opportunity cost of the film's
underwriting) contribution to the field of science fiction cinema. Don't
bother looking for any explication of the political, technological, or
social developments of the 250 years that allegdly transpire between the
present and the film's milieu; the cinematographer's chief inspiration for
22nd century Brooklyn seems to have been Super Mario Bros. The "President
of the Federation" was inexplicably feckless;  I've seen more grace under
pressure (and better dialogue) from my local McDonalds night supervisor.
When the director's vision of the ancient race of interstellar good-guy
patrons turned out not to include the ability to stay a closing elevator
door, I knew the film was in trouble. 
"Buckaroo Banzai" was also a helluva lot funnier. The only (intentional) 
comic relief in "The Fifth Element" waits until two thirds of the way into
its 122 minutes to show up in the form of a refugee from a cancelled UPN
show, but who is supposed to be a DJ (apparently, the dominant form of
mass media in the 22nd century will be radio).  This might have been an
opportunity for yet another satire of the media, but even that would have
been preferable to the tiresome hysterics provided by this buffoon. 
The vast majority of screen time is taken up with either mediocre car
chases and gunfights or Milla Jovovich trying to duplicate Jodie Foster's
shameless Oscar grab in "Nell". Note that this movie was directed by Luc
Besson, the man who brought us "La Femme Nikita". Jovovich's character is
supposed to be this "perfect human" (think the title character from
"Species" with a heart (and an accent)), strong enough to rip through her
"unbreakable"  incubation chamber. She is even shown memorizing Earth's
library of martial arts. So what does Besson do? He exempts her, alone
among all the primary (and secondary) characters, from the Universal
Action Hero Immunity to Automatic Weapons. During the penultimate fight
scene, Jovovich is trapped in a ventilation shaft and fired on repeatedly.
Note that we also don't get to see her get wounded, which is the only
reason to wound a hero in an action movie. We simply don't see her again
until Willis has (after letting the aforementioned DJ grab far more screen
time than he deserves) dispatched the bad guys and comes back to rescue
her. The washed-up Special Forces guy turned-cabbie is better in a fight
than the interstellar female assassin/Avatar of Good. Right. 
Saving graces: Gary Oldman as Joe Bob Briggs, the (not really) 
surprisingly impotent arms-dealing mastermind and Servant of Evil
(everyone knows that the Mark of the Devil is secretions of Hershey's
Chocolate Syrup on the forehead, right?). Eric Serra's eclectic
soundtrack. 
Go see "Twelve Monkeys" instead. You'll come away with a much better
feeling about Bruce Willis, science fiction, screenwriting, French cinema,
and the future of humanity. 
--
Eric G. Scharf                                     escharf@seattleu.edu
http://www.seattleu.edu/~escharf/film/5thelement.html
http://www.seattleu.edu/~escharf/film/
http://www.seattleu.edu/~escharf/

Author
Bennett Nason
        It seems that many people are analyzing/understanding the
movie incorrectly.  The movie, as many people state, isn't meant to be
serious (despite the message that love has extraordinary power at the
end, which I kinda' liked...)  It has a *ton* of humor in it, which is
one of the most decisive factors in favor of this movie.  I couldn't
help but laugh all the way through the scene with the Father and Zorg
(not to disclose too much here, but the funny looking alien thing with
the long nose and the little robots were too much, not to mention Ruby
and Zorg in general...)
        In addition, the special effects were simply dazzling...  the
visual artistry within this movie is deserving of much merit.  The
label of "eye candy" that is applied to it isn't in my mind fair.  To
call this film "eye candy" would be like calling the Mona Lisa "eye
candy", something I hope all reading this would understand to be too
simplistic.  The scenes of NY and the multi-layered traffic scenes are
absolutely breathtaking.  (As a disclaimer, I'm not comparing T5E to
the Mona Lisa... just drawing an analogy of sorts...)
        As far as the script and acting go, I'm more or less convinced
that it is so-so.  However, I enjoyed throughly the performances of
Oldman (Zorg), Ruby, and thought that Jovovich did a damned cool job
of playing Leeloo.  However, I don't go to movies to gaggle and drool
over good acting - if that's what I want, I go to stage performances.
The two mediums are meant for different things, and you'll find many
mroe talented **ACTORS**, in the purest sense, on stage, not on
screen.  Screen actors have to perform differently, and they more or
less didn't detract from this movie.
        So, in the end, I think that the movie is a success, in that
it delivers all it is meant to.  It isn't meant to be th most fabulous
movie of all time - it is meant to entertain and do so well.  In that
regard, I didn't get bored once, but stayed entertained and more all
the way through.  

Author
Ryan Maves
"The Fifth Element" is a fairly decent sci-fi flick by Luc Besson,
Frenchman and creator of other such timeless epics as "La Femme Nikita"
and "The Professional". After some coin-flipping, my girlfriend and I
decided to go see this instead of "Austin Powers". Following some cajoling
of my roommate and another friend, the four of us made our way to the
theater. And this is what we thought.
In short: nice try. "The Fifth Element" is a spectacular-looking movie
with a great soundtrack, but things drop off abruptly after that. Besson
seems to have borrowed its plot from a grade-C fantasy novel I read in
junior high. Not to rob the viewing audience of the thrill of seeing it,
this is the essence of the storyline:
Every 5,000 years, the stars align properly to permit a black hole to
form, unleashing an ultimate Evil with a Capital E that immediately heads
out to destroy life, specifically life on Earth. A band of good aliens
left a weapon on Earth long ago (in Egypt) to destroy this evil; this
weapon is formed out of the classical four elements (wind, earth, fire,
and water) which are united around a mysterious "fifth element". Don't
worry, all of this is explained using lots of little words in the first
five minutes of the film.
The film opens in Egypt in the early 20th century, at the tmeple where the
weapon is stored. The good aliens show up (to say "hi", I suppose) but are
driven away when Luke Perry (I'm quite serious), an archaeologist's
assistant, blows his top and starts shooting at them. They take the
weapon's components away with them for safekeeping until Evil returns.
In any case, the appointed time arrives during the 23rd century, and the
good aliens are unfortunately prevented from personally delivering the
weapon by some evil aliens known as Mangalores. Only "the fifth element"
survives the crash of their ship, and it is taken to Earth to be restored.
What is this ultimate weapon? It is an anorexic supermodel, Milla
Jovovich, who escaped from the Eart authorities to be rescued by formal
elite soldier and current cabbie, Bruce Willis. And you know you're in
trouble when Bruce Willis is the best actor onscreen for the first thrity
minutes or so.
Better acting, in the form of Gary Oldman, arrives soon. Gary is an evil
industrialist who wants to capture the weapon for some reason or another.
He pursues the Willis-Jovovich duo relentlessly as they quest across
planets to retrieve the remaining components of the weapon. En route,
Milla discovers that humanity is capable of great destruction (gasp!) and
that love will keep us together (awwww...).
This movie has, it must be said, moments of greatness. The action scenes
are great, the effects are stunning, and all in all Besson has created a
stunning and rich world out of his mind's eye. It's sad, though, that the
best parts of the film are the parts when (a) no one is saying very much,
and (b) no one is thinking very much. The revelations made in the film
(war=bad, love=good) are about as profound as my breakfast, and the
underlying "mythology" of an ultimate Evil and the four elements are ideas
that any two-bit writer could have scribbled on a bar napkin at 3 AM after
drinking a few stiff Manhattans.
Oddly enough, I think this movie deserves to be seen. It is a great
sensory experience, particularly the backgrounds, effects, and the great
soundtrack by Eric Serra. (Warning: it does look "French". The soldiers
even wear berets.) The impact of this film could be lost on video, so
shoot for a matinee.

Author
Jesse Kaplan
THE FIFTH ELEMENT:  A FILM REVIEW BY Jesse A. Kaplan
Cast:  Bruce Willis, Gary Oldman, Milla Jovivovich, Chris Tucker, Ian
Holm, Luke Perry
Directed by Luc Besson
Wow!  When I orginally found out about THE FIFTH ELEMENT (T5E) I was
amazed by not only the plot, the effects, the sets, and the casts, but
just how what an incredibly different movie it was going to be.  Well
now its out all over and has gotten some mixed reviews.  Let me tell you
something ladies and gentlemen, this movie is terrific.
    All the future will be lost unless the fifth element is found.  I
don't even know how to explain the movie so I won't.  Let me say this
then.  If you like action, Sci-Fi, great costumes, an amazingly hott up
and coming actress, shoot 'em up, futuristic ride of your life the T5E
is the movie for you this summer.
    Bruce Willis (DIE HARD, PULP FICTION) is at his best as an Ex-Marine
turned taxi who has to save the world from annialation from the
unltimate evil.  Evil is helped by the crooked arms dealer billioniare
Zorg, played by Gary Oldman (THE PROFESSIONAL, AIR FORCE ONE).  Leeloo,
as the Fifth Element, the surprime being must be used correctly to
defeat this evil with help from a struggling to save priest, Holm, and
his assistant.  Once the action moves to the space resort we are met be
D.J. Ruby Rodd ,Chris Tucker (FRIDAY) who is a great cross between
Prince, Dennis Rodman, and Orpah Whinfrey.
    The sets and costumes and the best part of the movie and the $90
million dolllar budget certainly isn't wasnted at all in this movie.
Definately one of the true hits of this summer.  Although compared to
Sci-Fi thrillers such as STARGATE and BLADE RUNNER, T5E works because
its not deep at all.  Simply great mindless fun, guarenteed to make your
$7.50 worthwhile.
THE FIFTH ELEMENT runs 2:07 and is worth every minute. It is rated PG-13
for brief female nudity, cartoonish violence, and a little profanity.
A definate winner,  *** 1/2.
Copyright 1997 paladin@mhv.net  Jesse A. Kaplan

Author
Mathew Tschirgi
The start of this movie reminded me of parts from the movie STARGATE.  People 
are looking around in an Egyptian temple reading about some dangerous thing 
that is going to destroy Earth in the future.  After a sort of confusing bit 
involving fake-looking cyborg things, the movie jumps into the future and the 
movie improves by leaps and bounds.
The basic idea behind the movie is that every once in a while (make that every 
1000 years or so) an evil force comes to destroy Earth.  The things needed to 
defend against this menace are the four Elements of Nature plus the Fifth 
Element.  The plot in this movie really isn't that important to the thing 
though.
This movie has very good special effects, for the most part.  The techno-ish 
music in the background fits the mood very well.  Bruce Willis is an illegal 
taxi-cab driver in a futuristic New York City.  One day a lady draped with a 
few bandages drops down into his trunk.  This movie is about what happens.
The plot twists are interesting and the movie never fails to present the 
viewer with a variety of different locations.  Also there is a fair bit of 
action in the film, particularly towards the end.  Some characters are just 
plain strange including a highly-energetic deejay in drag.  Bruce Willis does 
his normal job of blowing things away like he always does.
The movie is definitely watchable and rarely slows down.  It is one of those 
sci-fi films where you'll be saying "cool" followed by a "what the hell?!?!".  
I give The Fifth Element *** out of ****.

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Entertaining if *really* ridiculous action-adventure epic from
French bad-boy director Luc Besson. Expensive, and it shows, but couldn't
they also have spent some money on a solid story, too?
There are so many good *individual* things in THE FIFTH ELEMENT, Luc
Besson's gargantuan adventure-fantasy epic, that it's easy to overlook how
they don't neccesarily add up to a good movie. On the plus side of the
balance sheet, we have action, adventure, and some of the most
lavish-looking scenes ever put on film. On the minus side, a silly story. A
very silly story.
In the abstract, ELEMENT is great fun. It moves fast and always has
something worth looking at, and for people who enjoy such things from movies
(I know I do), it's very enjoyable. But there are limits. The movie has been
(unfairly) compared to BLADE RUNNER, which is one of the few really profound
SF movies out there. ELEMENT is mostly a loud action movie with some SF
trappings -- and one of the most sumptuous visual styles yet put on screen.
The mega-cities are big, but they looked a little more like really big
*sets* than actual environments. Maybe that's deliberate, since the movie
wears its ambitions to be entertaining pretty plainly.
The movie opens at the turn of the 20th century, with some aliens dropping
in on an archaeological dig (Luke Perry gets a few cute moments as a junior
archaeologist that Indy Jones would probably want to deck). Much mystical
mumbo-jumbo is exchanged. Flash-forward to 300 years from now, when former
military man Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis, being his usual self), now a
cabdriver, becomes the unwitting rescuer of Leeloo, a genetically engineered
superbeing that is the fulfillment of a cosmic prophecy. The rest of the
plot involves securing four stones that can help Leeloo complete her mission
of saving the world against a gigantic evil thing that resembles a sentient
star.
I mentioned that this was an adventure fantasy. ELEMENT is only SF by
accident; it uses the trappings of SF to dress up a basically silly story.
But just because it's a silly story doesn't mean a fun time can't be had.
The movie has an incredible amount of confidence in itself, even when giving
us scenes that are ridiculous in the extreme.
Most surprising is Milla Jovovitch as Leeloo. She's given the interesting
job of playing a character who can't communicate directly with anyone (at
first), and she succeeds in making Leeloo a sympathetic and truly *alien*
character. There is also a touch of philosophy in her character: What's the
point of saving a race that is only hellbent on its own destruction anyway?
I wish some of this stuff had been explored further in the movie, but that's
not where the movie's agenda really lies. Also good is Gary Oldman, who
holds himself slightly more in check here than he did in Besson's THE
PROFESSIONAL (where his tics and mannerisms threatened to destroy every
scene he was in).
ELEMENT is bound to be enshrined in the college fratboy SF hall of fame. It
wants to entertain and be fairly bizarre. It succeeds in both respects.
Watch it in a theater with a good sound system, and check your brain at the
door. Sometimes, though, I wish mindless fun didn't have to cost so much.

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
It is 250 years in the future.  Dallas (Willis), an ex-soldier,
drives taxis in the swarming metropolis of New York.  One day a
orange-haired nymphet Leeloo (Jovovich) speaking an unknown
language crash-lands in his taxi.  Soon she is doing the "speed
learn from an encyclopedia" shtick and with the help of a priest
(Holm, and by the look of his acolyte's headgear his religion
must worship of early 80s rock bands) we find out the universe is
doomed.  Unless, of course, four widgets are obtained from a
remote location and assembled in a Dungeons and Dragons puzzle
room, against the wishes of the evil businessman Zorg (Oldman)
and a group of unexplained shape-changing aliens.
Did that sound silly?  You have no idea ...  There are several
types of logical blunders in fiction.  In "The Fifth Element" the
first type betrays perhaps nothing more than carelessness on
director Besson's part: black holes mentioned in 1914,
temperatures of -5000 C, a (apparently) three hour flight during
which the passengers cryosleep to avert boredom, a planet "in the
constellation of ...".  Stupid, but the plot does not in any way
depend on these points - they are at most distracting.  You
shouldn't get too upset about such trivia.  A second might be the
absurd fact that once accepted allows the rest of the story
to proceed - a flying, invulnerable superhero; a rapid growing,
parasitic alien that can lay eggs in any humanoid; or (in this
case) the assembly of four artifacts to save the universe.
But "The Fifth Element" abounds with another type of mistake,
in the logic that leads the story from one point to another.
Although the moment to moment action is straightforward and the
plot is essentially simple, upon analysis it is completely
nonsensical.  The President, the fate of the entire universe at
stake mind you, orders a low-key one-man mission.  Leeloo is
surprised and shattered by the human concept of war, forgetting
that her race has spent eons fighting genocidal forces intent on
obliterating all life, that her ship was destroyed by hostile
forces, and that she has been karate-chopping and waving guns
about for the past hour.  Zorg's motives are murky and his
controller totally unexplained.  Several times the plot powers
itself out of dead-ends using "with one mighty leap he was free!"
logic.  Possibly there is a lot of footage on the cutting room
floor, possibly a lot of explanatory material was excised from
the script.  Or maybe the film is just plain dumb.
The cast is crowded with superfluous characters and execrable
acting.  Gary Oldman, sounding like a cross between Gomer Pyle
and Anthony Robbins, falls into both categories.  On the bright
side Willis does well, albeit as a caricature, while Jovovich is
surprisingly good even when required to utter stupid lines.  (The
more English she speaks, the less convincing her character
becomes.)  Mention should also be made of Luke "don't blink or
you'll miss me" Perry, who deserves bigger roles, and a bizarre
cameo as a mugger by Matthieu Kassovitz (director of "La Haine"
and star of "Un Heros Tres Discret").
And despite the above problems, the film is fairly enjoyable.
Besson has always favoured (and got away with) feel over logic
and look over plot.  For example, his "Subway" and "La Femme
Nikita" are fun despite also being plainly ridiculous.  But more
recently, with "Leon the Professional" he showed a masterful
handling of script, direction and character with more lucid and
intense plotting.  "The Fifth Element" is big step back to his
earlier work, a big, dumb but likeable film.  The whole is absurd
but the parts are quite good: a bioengineered opera diva,
residential blocks designed for police lockdown, the dizzying
heights of New York protruding from a smoggy abandoned surface,
cigarettes that are 75% filter.  In a way the correct film to
compare it to would be "Bladerunner", not for the narrative but
for the vision of a brash, busy and colourful future - a
three-way collision between Ridley Scott, Doc EE Smith and
Jean-Paul Gaultier.  It also helps that the central conflict is
at once broad (good vs.  evil) and very personal (Dallas fighting
for Leeloo), largely avoiding machismo and flag-waving.
It grieves me to recommend a picture to "switch your mind
off" at.  But unlike other big dumb pictures (like most anything
coming out of the Hollywood system), "The Fifth Element" is a
little different, more colourful, more exciting and less
offensive.  If you're going to take your mind candy, it may as
well taste good.  Unfortunately this film will probably not come
across well on video due to the diminishing of the visuals.
[**/ok] and on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"The Fifth Element"
Directed by Luc Besson.
Starring Bruce Willis, Milla Jovovich, Ian Holm, Gary Oldman,
Brion James, Luke Perry, Tom "Tiny" Lister Jr, Matthieu Kassovitz.
Released 1997.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Author
Ferruccio Barletta
I've just come back from seeing "The Fifth Element". This movie is
a perfect example of what happens when Hollywood spends a lot of money
on sets and props but doesn't want to waste money on talented writers
or actors. This movie really couldn't decide whether it wanted to be
an action-adventure movie or a comedy.
The story plodded on for two hours with a lot of scenes that were
obviously thrown in so that Bruce Willis could do his "Die Hard in Space"
bit. I really liked the Die Hard movies but, throughout the entire film,
Willis seemed like he was too bored to really put any effort into it.
And his performace was the best one in the movie.
The many attempts at comic relief came across like three stooges bits.
They usually elicited groans from the audience rather than laughs.
Except for Willis and the girl, every character seemed very
cartoon-like. I would not have been the least bit surprised if Roger Rabbit
was in one of the scenes. Every single major character was very clearly Good,
Evil or incompetent.
This is one of the worst movies I have ever seen. It's boring,
unimaginative, boring, unexciting, boring, stupid and most of
all: BORING! The only positive thing I can say about it is that it has
reasonably good music.
This movie might just be bad enough to become a cult classic.

Author
Phil Curtolo
Bruce Willis is a type-casted actor. In Die Hard, he played John
McClaine, a rough and tough Chicago cop who gets caught in the wrong
place at the wrong time. Again, in Pulp Fiction, as Butch Coolidge, an
over-the-hill boxer, he steps on the wrong guys toes. In Luc Besson's
The Fifth Element, Willis plays Korben Dallas, a New York cabby who
takes in the wrong passenger at the worst possible time.
A stylish science fiction epic, The Fifth Element's complex plot begins
right away, in the deserts of Egypt (think Stargate) in 1914. An
enormous spacecraft lands above a pyramid where the "5 Elements" are
stored and takes them away, vowing to return them when the evil comes
back.
Cut to present day, which is our future. The year is 2023, and New York
is the city. The only basic differences between Besson's futuristic
depiction and the real life New York is that the smog is thicker, the
buildings are higher, and the traffic floats! 
Anyway, the "evil" comes back as a ball of fire to wreak havoc on the
fair citizens of the earth, so back come the tortoise-like aliens to
return the "5 Elements" to Earth, in order to defend themselves against
the "evil." In the process, however, the ship is intercepted by 2
fighter pods and is destroyed before landing. When officials arrive at
the site, all that remains is a hand. What can you do with a hand? Hey,
its the 21st Century here-DNA reconstruction! This hand turns out to
belong to a beautiful, but mysterious woman named Leeloo (Milla
Jovovich, Dazed and Confused). She escapes and, attempting to escape the
police by swan diving off of an enormous skyscraper and crashing through
the roof of Korben's floating cab.
It's love at first site, as Korben and Leeloo elude the lazy-as-always
cops. When Leeloo begins mumbling about a Cornelius (Ian Holm, Night
Falls on Manhattan), Korben searches the "Yellow Pages" and delivers her
to the door of the good reverend, the only man who knows of her
background and duties. Now, Korben, Leeloo, and Cornelius must journey
to a foreign planet to board a cruise ship (special effects were
spectacular here) to find the remaining four elements. It is here, where
they discover that they have been followed by the evil Jean-Baptiste
Emmanuel Zorg (Gary Oldman, Murder in the First). He, too, wants
possession of the elements, as do a group of pig-like warriors (think
the Gamorreans in Return of the Jedi). 
In a spectacular ending, with time running out, Leeloo is faced with a
problem-why should she save a people who live to destroy each other? The
question is a good one, and one that could be pondered. But enough of
that. When Korben points out his love for her, Leeloo is inclined to
become the "5th element" and save the world from total destruction.
The Fifth Element features good performances by Willis and Holm, an
excellent portrayal of a comedic villain (who reminded me a lot of Jack
Nicholson's The Joker in Batman) by one of the masters of villainy,
Oldman, and a heartfelt offering by relative newcomer Jovovich. The
supporting cast, which includes Brion James ( Tango & Cash), Tim "Tiny"
Lester (No Holds Barred), Luke Perry (Buffy the Vampire Slayer), and
Chris Tucker (Friday), added a comedic effect to the film.
Although Besson's The Fifth Element can be criticized for the
outlandish use of cliches, it is a solid motion picture with a definite
point. Some other directors (like Anaconda's Luis Llosa) should take a
lesson from this guy-using ideas from epic motion pictures the right
way. Ideas from Star Wars and Stargate were utilized for the improvement
of this film. Sci-fi fan or not, any movie-lover should see this
wonderfully stylish motion picture.
Grade: A-, ****1/2 out of *****

Author
Cameron Shelley
The Fifth Element is a hard movie to pin down. Perhaps
the best way to describe it is as a collage of sights and events
organized (if that is the word) around the mission of an
unlikely hero to save the world. For me, at least, watching
TFE had the quality of a daydream, or the fantasies sparked
in adolescent years when reading a comic book. Like a
daydream, the sequence of events makes little sense upon
later reflection, and like an adolescent fantasy, the characters
are drawn from a small stock of simple and familiar types.
But it is the "sparky" aspect of TFE that is most obvious.
Scenes, jokes, and plot devices fly off energetically and
disappear in almost all directions. This is probably what has
prompted so many reviewers to compare TFE to nearly
every other science-fiction movie they've seen. Certainly,
TFE does have a kind of borrowed look. The hovering cars
are reminiscent of Blade Runner, the glowing ball of evil
and the cabbie hero of Heavy Metal, the Egyptian aliens of
Stargate, the farcical police of Brazil, and on and on. Plenty
of action-adventure cliches get screen time as well -
although I think the 3-D car chase scene was pretty good
and deserves credit for originality. But Besson seems
neither to parody nor plagiarize these earlier films. TFE is
simply a pastiche of their more obvious attributes. If you
consider collage to be good art, then TFE could be
appealing; otherwise it will probably seem to be just
pointlessly contrived. My own view is somewhat in
between: I don't get the impression that Besson is just
rehashing used material from the genre, but neither does
his profligate use of such material seem coherently ironic
or tongue-in-cheek. To a large extent, it is all just there.
In any case, Besson does his borrowing pretty well. The
scenery, gizmos, and aliens are generally lively and
eye-catching. The costumes too are interesting and
appropriate. The inscrutable and somewhat maladroit
aliens, the Mondoshawan, have big, clunky environment
suits to stomp around in. The belligerent (and stupid)
Mangalores dress and act like rhinos, at least when not in
disguise. And the bizarre talk-show host, Ruby Rhod, looks
and talks like a sped-up version of Prince with his hair on
amphetamines. And, of course, there are many gorgeous
women in various states of dress and undress. These
characters, and the special effects associated with them,
succeed in holding the viewer's attention and interest
while on screen.
Generally, the acting is also good in the sense that it is
energetic and appropriate to the task. Jovovich, in fact, puts
on a good performance as Leeloo, the genetically perfect
human sent to Earth by the Mondoshawan to save it from
the big evil ball from another dimension. Her role is one of
the naive innocent thrust into a fallen world she naturally
doesn't understand, which she delivers with a sort of
girlish enthusiasm. Gary Oldman also deserves credit for a
deftly greasy turn as the evil industrialist Zorg, who is in
cahoots with the evil ball itself (we know this because the
ball gives Zorg a phone call, calling itself "Mr. Shadow"),
while Chris Tucker goes "over-the-top" portraying the
shrill and mincing Ruby Rhod. At the center of all this is
the character of Korbin Dallas, as mailed in by Bruce Willis.
Willis's performance is often flat (as opposed, say, to
understated), a problem which may be caused by the
similarity of Korbin to most other characters Willis has
played since Moonlighting. Whereas TFE's other
borrowings are generally superficial and lightly handled,
Willis's self-plagiarism comes off as plodding, at least
when there are no babes or firefights to distract attention
from him.
The roughest point of the movie, though, concerns the
plot. Certainly, action-adventures aren't supposed to be
intellectually challenging, but the plot of TFE is
inexplicably arbitrary even for its genre. Every 5000 years, a
big evil ball shows up and menaces the Earth. Every 5000
years, the Earth is saved from the evil ball by the
benevolent Mondoshawan, using the four elements of
earth, air, water, and fire, and a mysterious Fifth Element
(Leeloo). But the Mondoshawan change the plan, with the
result that in 2300 they fail and humanity must be bailed
out by genetic engineering and a heroic cabbie. No
motivation for these intricacies is offered, nor do they
make much sense in retrospect. Well, the Mondoshawan
do actually offer their motivational motto, "Time is
nothing, life is most important," (here they sound like ad
men for Pepsi) upon arriving three hundred years early,
killing an Egyptologist for knowing too much, and then
taking off with Earth's only means of defense. Yeah,
thanks. Attempts to moralize intrude awkwardly from
time to time, as when Zorg nearly chokes to death on a
cherry, or when Leeloo learns about "war" and suddenly
wonders if humanity is worth saving. Fortunately, Korbin
saves the day by declaring his love for Leeloo. Oddly,
Besson seems to really want to make a meal of this
last-minute complication, but only gets well-deserved
snickering from the audience. TFE does alright in the use
of the future to parody the present, but it can hardly claim
to be an exploration of serious issues such as war, love, or
the rather suspect notion of "perfection" in genetic
engineering either.
TFE is carried by its energy and surface appeal, but it is a
precariously thin surface. Having borrowed so heavily
from other works, Besson risks having his film already
eclipsed by its predecessors as well as its successors. The
next big effects-driven, science-fiction picture may indeed
finish the job. As Bruce Willis said, in reacting to some
negative reviews of TFE, "The written word is going the
way of the dinosaur." Presumably, then, the next picture
with an even larger ratio of effects budget to writing budget
will be even better!
cpshelle@watarts.uwaterloo.ca - Phone: (519) 888-4567 x2555
        Me: http://watarts.uwaterloo.ca/~cpshelle/>
            CEL: http://cogsci.uwaterloo.ca/>
Dept: http://watarts.uwaterloo.ca/PHIL/cpshelle/philosophy.html>

Author
Alex Fung
THE FIFTH ELEMENT (Columbia - 1997)
Starring Bruce Willis, Gary Oldman, Ian Holm, Milla Jovovich,
  Chris Tucker, Luke Perry, Brion James
Screenplay by Luc Besson, Robert Mark Kamen
Produced by Patrice Ledoux
Directed by Luc Besson
Running time: 127 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
Regarding Luc Besson's THE FIFTH ELEMENT, nobody could quite
summarize it so succinctly and so accurately as Mr. Besson's himself;
of his film, which he conceived at age sixteen, he commented:
"I was writing solely for the pleasure of it. I just put down on
paper everything that I love and see. I just like to go for it, and I
consider the serious questions later."
That this is clearly evident in THE FIFTH ELEMENT would be somewhat
of an understatement; this film seems to be a celluloid collage of a
sci-fi fanboy's wildest fantasies. You want a goon squad of
shapeshifting alien villians? You want benevolent aliens marching
about Egyptian ruins? You want a giant, virtually unstoppable clump
of Pure Evil rushing towards planet Earth, signifying the destruction
of Life As We Know It(tm)? You want a battered Everyman (it's not by
accident he's a taxi driver, the cinematic signifyer that This Is An
Average Joe - see HEAVY METAL for a similar futuristic equivalent),
pretty waif in tow, struggling against a sinister meglomaniac and his
army of mercenaries to Save The Planet(tm) in a prototypical battle
of Good vs. Evil? Boy, have you come to the right movie.
Mr. Besson throws striking sequences one after the other onscreen,
and while they hardly coalesce in any sort of cohesive manner, in an
odd way THE FIFTH ELEMENT sort of works; it's loud, bizarre, and
remarkably silly, but to its credit the film never takes itself
seriously in the least, and we are bombarded by so many audacious
images and sights that it never becomes boring.
Not exactly high praise, to be sure, but THE FIFTH ELEMENT isn't
exactly a great film. Its greatest strengths are its visuals; the
sets and costumes are astonishing. Save for a fifteen-minute
prologue, the film is set in 23rd century Earth, and Mr. Besson's
view of it is a staggering one: multi-levelled congested traffic from
flying automobiles zipping about, towering skyscrapers stretching
above the smog on the surface beyond the reaches of the eye,
plummeting elevators screaming down rails, and, of course, that
Universal constant, McDonalds. The scenes in which we explore this
strange new world through the eyes of Leeloo (Milla Jovovich), our
genetically re-engineered heroine, are a visual feast, and a triumph
not only for Mr. Besson's vision, but for the effects team at Digital
Domain. Even that staple of the uninspired action film, the chase
scene, takes new life in THE FIFTH ELEMENT; it's really something to
watch Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis), our taxi-driving hero,
desperately weave through three dimensional traffic in order to
attempt to lose the police. Dan Weil's award-worthy production design
is terrific, particularly the magnificent auditorium scene in the
off-Earth resort complex.
THE FIFTH ELEMENT is filled with sequences and effects which should
be a sci-fi fanboy's delight: the onscreen meticulous genetic
reconstruction of Leeluu, from a scrap of recovered DNA to a
scantily-clad, orange-haired pixie; the demonstration of evil Zorg's
(Gary Oldman) powerful homing gun, which is never again used in the
film. Why does Mr. Besson show us this stuff in the film? Why,
because (in my best fanboy voice) it looks really really cool!
(fanboy voice off) They're along the same lines as the gratuitous
nothing other than to impress.
Tossing every wild idea that comes your way, though, can result in a
lot of unnecessary onscreen junk which rather clearly fails to serve
any purpose. I really couldn't think of any reason as to why the
tentacled blue alien diva had to be tossed into the mix, other than
so that Mr. Besson could perform a lot of cross-cutting between her
wailing and the action going on elsewhere in the resort complex. For
that matter, other than for sheer audacity, was it really even
necessary for the resort complex to be halfway across the galaxy?
At this point I come to the most blatant of the unnecessary elements
(no pun intended) of the film; the prancing, perpetually-screeching
over-the-top Ruby Rhod (Chris Tucker) character. Why, oh why? He
seems to be there sheerly for comic relief, but given all of the
other comedic elements in the film (Ian Holm's hapless, bumbling
priest Cornelius, Gary Oldman's scenery-chewing Zorg), was it even
necessary? The Ruby Rhod character never works and is extremely
grating, and by the time the film reached its denoument I had the
sinking feeling that he was introduced simply so that there'd be an
obligatory fourth person around in order to activate The Fifth
Element.
Coming off the best in THE FIFTH ELEMENT is Milla Jovovich, as the
wide-eyed Leeluu, who's so wonderfully expressive in her performance
that I had to ground myself by noting that she had virtually no
dialogue in the film. Ian Holm was also effective as the good-hearted
but incompentant priest (no world saver is he). Gary Oldman is one of
today's best actors, but his over-the-top performance in Mr. Besson's
earlier film, the terrific THE PROFESSIONAL (a.k.a. LEON), is dwarfed
by his bizarre villanous turn here - granted, it does make for
interesting viewing, particularly when one considers the
pointlessness of his role. Bruce Willis' performance in THE FIFTH
ELEMENT, however, is unremarkable; surrendering to the gargantuan
scope of the film's set pieces and its mythological struggle of Good
vs. Evil, he's merely along for the ride.
THE FIFTH ELEMENT is a hodgepodge of individual sequences, visual
effects and set pieces, some of them wonderfully inspired, and others
misfiring badly. It doesn't all work out together, but on the basis
of the effective spectacle of Mr. Besson's wonderously bizarre vision
alone, the film is worth seeing, and the other strengths in THE FIFTH
ELEMENT (of which there are, believe it or not, a few) are icing on
the cake.

Author
Tim Voon
I truly enjoyed the visual beauty of Ridley Scott's 'Blade Runner' and
in certain respects, director Luc Besson has achieved with the 'Fifth
Element',  what can be described as a visually beautiful movie.
The concept of five elements coming together to protect earth is a good
base for any plot. Its opening scenes has a similar reminiscent feel to
'Star Gate'; the movie is fast moving and is never for a moment dull,
with snappy, alternative music to guide it along. The big disappointment
is it's ending which becomes cliched, when Korben has to profess his
love to the fifth element before she can perform her duty (not so
perfect after all).
Part of the promotion for this movie was 'The Fifth Element It Must Be
Found.' In all fairness they should have added 'Where Did They Stash The
Other Four?' as much of the movie madly revolves about finding them; and
the advertisements for MacDonalds is shameless but nevertheless
entertaining.
People have been talking about the intricacies of Blade Runner's plot
since it's release more than a decade ago. Who was the fifth escapee
replicant? Was it Deckard? Or was it Rachael? This makes an intriguing
after-dinner conversation (+/- argument), believe me.
Unfortunately, nobody will be having long discussions about why the
earth doesn't have more moons if 'Darkness' returned every five thousand
years, or why human space was so badly patrolled allowing the Mangalore
fighters to destroy the Mondoshawan craft, or why the Fifth Element goes
all soft and gooey when she reads about war and man's other destructive
qualities, then has second thoughts about saving mankind. Hmmmmm.
This movie will be remembered if not for it's plot, for its memorable
scenes like Lee Loo jumping of a sky scraper, the police car line up,
the Chinese sail boat take-away, and the enchanting blue Diva singing
operetta as Lee Loo fights, and will inevitably become what is
considered a cult classic.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director/Co-author: Luc Besson
Starring: Bruce Willis, Milla Jovovich, Gary Oldman, Ian Holm, Chris Tucker, 
Luke Perry, Tiny   Lister Jr., Tricky, John Neville, Brion James
I remember when a movie called STARGATE came out a couple years ago.  It 
looked so interesting and so damn cool.  Then I saw it...dull as a lecture on 
the pros and cons of photosynthesis.  'Course it went on to make a lot of 
money while the director's second feature became the most overly popular 
flick of last year (that was, in case you've been shacking up with J.D. 
Salinger, INDEPEDENCE DAY...another nice idea turned pretty stupid albeit 
much better than STARGATE).
I've heard Luc Besson's THE FIFTH ELEMENT being compared to STARGATE.  My big 
question is: "Like, in what ways, man?"  THE FIFTH ELEMENT is a sigh of 
relief from those hokey sci-fi films of olden days that should be shown on 
MST3K like THIS ISLAND EARTH and THE AMAZING COLLOSSAL MAN.  
While the plot isn't totally amazing (I know, we were all expecting satire 
here a la blade runner with a bit of Kafka tossed in just to differ the two), 
it's more interesting than anything else out, so why are we all bitching?  I 
refuse to totally divulge the plot since it's been nicely bottled up by M. 
Besson so when one sees it, they're shocked, which is what SHOULD happen 
anyway: the world is going to be destroyed and a mysteriously woman with 
bizarre hair and a fluent other language (I'm giving Milla Jovovich a medal 
for speaking it so convincingly) is the only hope.  She lands in the cab of a 
bitter ex-army guy, Korben Dallas (a very likable Bruce Willis) and the fun 
begins. 
THE FIFTH ELEMENT starts off slowly but then never sags as it accelerates to 
what felt like 130 mph.  The film just takes off from the first slow frame 
and by the end, you're going "Wow!"  Not only is the film very wild, it looks 
like the inside of someone's head...allow me to translate what that meant: 
reportingly, M. Besson tried to put one of his stories from his youth onto 
celluloid and just had enough money to do that.  I sympathize with him, 
because I've had bizzare futuristic visions in my head too and I can picture 
what it probably was like (too many plot holes, I can guess).  The future 
isn't really grim or anything, it's just very technical, and he satrizes this 
with several "nice touches."  For one thing, everything's compact and 
semi-convenient.  A comical, Chaplin-esque scene takes place in his small, 
claustrophobic apartment where he hides people in several different places 
(i.e. the shower which moves up and down with a freezing closet and a bed 
that slides underneath a cabinet).  And one of the best "nice touches" 
includes the cigarettes with a filter that takes up a good 9/10 of the actual 
cigarrette.  
The film is a treat for the eyes and the story is a hoot to watch as it 
unfolds before our eyes with a touch of Kafka in it.  The sight of a 
metropolis with flying cars buzzing by at high speeds is, well, orgasmic.  
This really could have sucked with a less-competent director.  I can see 
Roland Emmerich making this into a disjumbled mess with hokey humor (my least 
fave kind of humor).  But Luc Besson gives it a great sense of humor (with 
many great jokes and fine comical performances) and handles it properly: 
unseriously.  If it had been serious, it would have sucked because the plot 
isn't made to be handled that way.
As far as the acting, it works with the good sense of humor.  Bruce Willis is 
likable but not great.  He gave his character a great feel, but it's no John 
McClane, James Cole or Butch Coolidge (but, hey!  He only gets the last two 
roles ever couple years!)  Milla Jovovich has been, well, okay in her past 
movies (like DAZED AND CONFUSED, KUFFS, CHAPLIN) but here, she's great.  I'm 
not a big fan of her but she was definitely a good scene stealer.  Gary 
Oldman is my personal fave over-actor and here, he has made a wonderful 
character to impersonate: a wildly eccentric capitalist with a hick accent 
which puts Jerry Lee Lewis's to shame.  The only real kind of annoyance was 
the usually great Chris Tucker, who plays a D.J. on speed, crack and many 
other kinds of drugs (I assume).  His character dresses worse than Dennis 
Rodman and speaks faster than the Micro-Machine man.  His first scene goes on 
too long (but gets a good laugh when Bruce shudders at the sound of his name 
a couple scenes later) but once the opera's over (get the opera for an 
original plot twist) and the bombs are flying, he's great.  And how can I 
forget Mr. Ian Holm (or, as I sometimes refer to him as "Mr. 
Most-Underrated-Actor-in-Modern-Times Holm"), who's comedy comes from his 
acting, not his hyperactivity (which he doesn't posess).  His facial 
expressions are priceless and he should get some kind of medal, just for 
being a great actor no matter what...including being held at gunpoint by a 
dog-looking alien.
And how can I even forget the wild, original costumes by Jean-Paul Gautier?  
They're breathtaking and if they don't win an oscar, I'll hire those dog-like 
aliens to bomb the Oscar ceremony (just kidding in case anyone takes me 
seriously).
Overall, this is a must-see film: a child-like film with a wild imagination. 
It's definitely not for everyone, but it's at least original and a fun ride.
P.S. Luke Perry gets ousted in the first 5 minutes.

Author
Christopher Null
     What can I say about THE FIFTH ELEMENT that you haven't probably
heard already?  Not much, but I will say that THE FIFTH ELEMENT is a
mess -- a mess of grand proportions, full of dazzling colors, lights,
explosions, outfits, and... hairstyles.  Designer John-Paul Gaultier's
involvement with Luc Besson's creation (the most expensive French
production ever) is well-known, as is Milla Jovovich's role as Leeloo,
supposedly the most perfect being (but I wouldn't have pegged her as
being so flaky).
     The plot, what there is of one, is your basic "cab driver saves the
world from a big flying ball of evil using magic rocks" story, with
Bruce Willis as the cabbie in question and Gary Oldman as the corporate
tycoon who wants the rocks for himself.  And while lots of things blow
up, most of the film is just plain boring and idiotic -- especially
Chris Tucker's performance as Ruby, an indecipherable, intergalactic
Dennis Rodman-meets-Rosie O'Donnell talk show host.  Plus there's the
blatant rip offs from BLADE RUNNER and BRAZIL that I won't even get
started on.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Author
Phil Brady
Blade Runner gets referred to frequently by people discussing The
Fifth Element. I suppose they are trying to articulate that both movies
give us a vivid image of the future, and this rendering becomes a major
character in the film. But while BR is a gritty exploration of "what is
a man?," Fifth Element just a headlong rush into fun. And just for fun,
replicant alumni Brion James  shows up in 5E as a not-so-bright general.
Actually, nobody comes off looking very clever, so we know early we're
in for a goofy time.
The setup is that EVIL shows up every 5000 years to take another shot
at us, but we are protected by four stones, representing the ancient
elements: earth, air, fire and water. They are actuated by a fifth
element - a "perfect being" that channels their power. They have a small
priesthood here on earth, but the true stewards are an otherworld race
best described as muppets made out of tuba parts. It's now the 23rd
century, and guess who's coming to dinner?
They got Bruce Willis to play the Bruce Willis part: an ex-marine
cabby down on his luck, lamenting to a friend that he hasn't met the
perfect woman. The savior being is cloned into a space babe played by
Milla Jovovich. Hmmm..what are the chances? In short order, she drops
literally into his lap while fleeing police goons. Bruce shakes the heat
and delivers her to the priest (Ian Holm) who knows what to do (but he's
not very good at it). The stones need to be retrieved from an opera diva
on a cruise-spaceship, and there's competition from a villain that wants
EVIL to win. Gary Oldman plays an addled industrialist who thinks that
he can sell more products in the chaos that follows total annihilation
(I DID say addled).
The Government pulls Bruce back in, and some good humor comes off as
all the principals converge on the stones. Bruce runs into a super-emcee
named Ruby Rhod (played by Chris Tucker). It's a fantastic character, an
amalgam of Prince, Dennis Rodman and Joan Rivers, but director Besson
commits the fatal Dom Deluise error. Dom can be a good addition to a
movie, but after two minutes, it's a case of diminishing returns. Ruby
gets to hang out with Bruce for the rest of the film, whining and
distracting the audience (that's the Joan Rivers part). I know Besson
falls in love with his leading ladies, as he did with Milla, but I can
only assume he was sleeping with Tucker as well.
So, anyway, Bruce gets the stones, saves the planet and gets the
girl. Ho-hum. I have yet to remark on the main character, Besson's
version of the future. I have seen this world before, as has anyone
reading Heavy Metal magazine for the last twenty years. The two art
directors are frequent contributors to that graphic novel collection,
and their vision is treated kindly by the special effects. The
three-dimensional gridlock in Gotham is well done, but more fun is
Bruce's apartment/cell. Ripley had a more comfortable cubicle in Aliens,
and Bruce's lesser appointments allow for some good sight gags. One that
tickled me was an homage to the opening scene in Blade Runner. Bruce is
also snacking and chatting with an Asian street vendor, but a pullback
shows that the lunch wagon is hovering outside the window panel in
Bruce's cube! Cute.
Hopefully, the blurbmeisters have not raised your expectations too
high and the non-SF types have not discouraged you. The Fifth Element is
a real eyeful, and a lot of fun. This movie is meant to tickle those
faithful to the SF genre, but it is a bit too far out there to hook many
converts.

Author
Elizabeth Reid
This movie brilliantly showcases the talents of Eric Serra, who wrote 
the music. Unfortunately the same can't be said for Luc Besson 
(director), Bruce Willis and Milla Jovovich (stars). 
Willis and Jovovich show only two emotions each throughout the movie 
-- Willis is either enraged or confused, while Jovovich is either 
feral or ditzy.  Besson seems to have abandoned coherence in favor of 
gaudiness. The plot is sketchy at best. Plot elements are introduced 
with impressive special effects but little explanation -- what exactly 
is a meteorite made from "pure evil", and what is the "Supreme 
Being/Fifth Element" supposed to do in the universe (apart from karate 
and the deflection of the evil meteorite)?  There is no sense of 
mystery, let alone suspense. The frequent countdowns toward bomb 
detonations or meteorite collisions pass zero without measurably 
quickening the audience's pulse-rate. 
The entire film is a sequence of petty larcenies from other movies. 
The opening sequence is from _Stargate_, the many spaceship shots are 
from _Star Wars_, the cityscapes are from _Blade Runner_ (and 
Jovovich's hair and acrobatics are cloned from Pris), the war montage 
is from _The Abyss_, DJ Ruby Rhod has just escaped (or possibly been 
ejected) from _Priscilla, Queen of the Desert_, Jean-Paul Gaultier's 
costumes are straight out of _Barbarella_ etc etc. Tributes and 
references are one thing; a constant lack of originality is quite 
another.
That said, the movie is fairly amusing. So long as you can stomach or 
ignore the metaphysical pretensions you can well enjoy the gaudy 
visuals, campy acting and slick action sequences. But frankly I think 
you'd do better to buy the soundtrack rather than a movie ticket.
Elizabeth.

Author
Michael Turton
_The Fifth Element_
Directed by Luc Besson. Starring Bruce Willis, Gary Oldman and Mila Jovovich.
Reviewed by Michael Turton.  Three Stars.
_The Fifth Element_ is a sci-fi spectacular combining action, epic and low
humor to create a rich but ultimately flawed tapestry of the future.  It is a
perfect example of the tremendous potential of science fiction, especially
given modern technology, and the continuing inability of mainstream film
directors to grasp this potential.
TFE tells the story of 300 years in the future, when an unlimited evil
awakens and threatens the universe.  A perfect being, the fifth element, is
necessary to combine with earth, air, fire and water to construct a weapon
against this evil.  After a brief and unnecessary prologue, the story opens
with the discovery of the evil being.  Although we are not shown it, it has
already contacted a powerful man named Zorg (Oldman) who is attempting
through his agents to acquire the four stones which represent earth, air,
fire and water and without which the weapon cannot be made.  An alien ship
presumably carrying the stones enters earth space and is destroyed by other
alien mercenaries in the pay of Zorg. Only Lilu (Jovovich), the perfect
being, survives.  Reconstituted at Federation HQ, she escapes and meets
Corbin Dallas (Willis).  Together the two retrieve the stones and save the
world.
The most basic question I have about TFE is "why?"  With so many awesome
stories, an entire century of science fiction for the most part still untold
on the big screen, why would anyone waste their time and money cobbling
together a second-rate heap of cliches into an epic space opera story? 
Underneath the beautiful sets, striking costumes, vast scope, frenetic pace
and first-rate directing is a story that was not exactly begging to be told,
for TFE has all the faults of mainstream handling of science fiction: there
is no character development, aliens exist only to carry out the
destruction/salvation of the world, the social order of earth is pretty much
the same as the one we know now, all aliens are bilaterally-symmetrical
bipeds, the science and technology are completely inconsistent or impossible
, and action is more important than idea.  Compare TFE to any sci-fi work
similar in scope and topic, such as Vernor Vinge's awesome epic _A Fire Upon
the Deep_ or the recently completed _Babylon 5_ TV series, and TFE comes off
badly.
It cannot be argued that TFE is somehow "not sci-fi."  Through numerous nods
to other famous sci-fi flicks, Besson attempted to place TFE squarely in the
sci-fi universe.  For example, Dallas eats at an asian noodle place just
before he gets the news of his mission, just as Deckard did in _Blade
Runner_.  The sequence of shots of the space liner entering Phloston Paradise
mimics the famous scenes of the Pan Am clipper entering the space station in
_2001_.  Leia Organa from Star Wars is neatly skewered in the "cinnamon buns"
hairdo of the battleaxe who was originally intended to go with Corbin Dallas
on his mission to save the universe.  The veteran sci-fi fan will notice
others as well, with _Blade Runner_ the predominant source.
As a movie, TFE is a mixed bag.  The directing is flawless and the pace
furious.  But there is entirely too much sly, self-conscious humor which all
too often disengages the viewer from his or her attempt to believe in the
movie's premise that the universe is desperately in need of saving.  An
entire character, Ruby Rod (Chris Tucker), was added only supply comic
relief.  Besson did not learn the lesson that George Lucas taught, namely:
that in addition to being fast and furious, epics must be completely innocent
and deadly serious.  Besson also forgot that the gods require a sacrifice:
the universe can be redeemed only through the death of the hero.
On the other hand, the costumes, sets and backgrounds are excellent.  The
editing is wonderful and the interposition of three or more separate pieces
of action in a single sequence, done in several places, is extremely
effective. Willis doeshis usual workmanlike job, but sometimes gives the
impression that he is condescending to appear in this role.  Gary Oldman as
the baddie Zorg is (as always) great -- no other actor combines wussiness
with intensity the way he does.
Ultimately, TFE must be regarded as a failure, albeit an entertaining one. 
Next time, I hope Besson decides to tackle a story more worthy of his
powerful talent, such as _The Stars My Destination_ or Niven and Pournelle's
_Inferno_, rather than serve up stale childhood fantasies dressed in the
science fiction equivalent of Sunday clothes.  Until then, TFE will remain a
good rental choice.  I give it *** out of *****.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Matt Williams
The best science fiction films manage to create a unique world,
populated with rich characters and coherent to its own logic.  The
Fifth Element only meets these goals part way.  It creates a visually
intriguing setting, but adds rudimentary characters and a fairly
standard action plot.
Three hundred years in the future, Earth faces a mysterious problem.
An unknown massive object has appeared in space, destroying all life it
touches.  When conventional weapons prove useless, one Father Cornelius
(Ian Holm) believes he may have the answer.  He has descended from an
order that has guarded a secret for 5000 years: a weapon of ultimate
good that can defeat the ultimate evil.  In order to use this weapon,
it is necessary to collect four stones (representing the four elements
of air, fire, earth and water), along with a mysterious "fifth
element".  However, gathering them may not be as easy as Father
Cornelius would hope, for there are other forces at work.
The industrialist Zorg (Gary Oldman) wants the stones for his own
nefarious purposes, and has the resources to get what he desires.
In the midst of this conflict is thrust Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis),
an ex-military man, now struggling as a hovercab driver.  Both fate and
his government draw him together with Leeluu (Milla Jovovich), a
strangely perfect humanoid alien who may hold the key to collecting and
using the elements.
The world that director Luc Besson has created is original and
breathtaking.  In fact, it is almost worth the admission for the
eye-candy alone.  Though cluttered, the sets makes firm strides away
from the gothic gloominess of Blade Runner, which has influenced nearly
every science fiction film in the last fifteen years.  The vibrant use
of color in the Fifth Element is refreshing (although you can't help
but compare Leeluu's bright orange hair with Korben's bright orange
tank top).  The costumes throughout are a bit over-the-top, but
interesting to look at, anyhow.  The film reaches its pinnacle with the
pure visual delight of its action pieces (the hovercar chase through
New York traffic is particularly spectacular).
However, once establishing so thrilling a setting, the remainder of the
film is somewhat of a letdown.  The Korben Dallas character is, well,
Bruce Willis.  Aside from the throwaway "my wife left me", there's not
much development there.  As Zorg, Gary Oldman gets to chew some
scenery, but he never really has much motive (other than just being
evil). Leeluu has some alluring enigma, but she remains shrouded in
mystery throughout the whole film, and is used more as a plot device
than a character.  And the characters used for comic relief
(particularly the shrill talk show host Rudy Rhod (Chris Tucker))
rarely have the effect desired.
As far as the movie's overall plot, you've got a MacGuffin to quest for
and some villains to provide obstacles, and a few throwaway morals
tacked onto the end.  Your basic action movie package...no insights
here.  Yet, as an action film, The Fifth Element is above normal,
owning many of the same stylistic touches that made Besson's earlier
works (La Femme Nikita and The Professional) such a treat to watch.
Sure, there are occasional inconsistencies, and the characters are
rather thin, but Luc Besson makes the best of the elements he has.
If you're hoping for a science fiction masterpiece, you won't get it in
the Fifth Element.  Go in expecting a decent action film with stunning
visuals, and you'll be sure to enjoy the ride.
Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 400 reviews, and information on over 500 upcoming releases

Author
Andrew Hicks
        THE FIFTH ELEMENT is an action / science-fiction hybrid 
that cost nearly $100 million to make but left out two of the most 
crucial elements of both genres. The best action flicks have a good 
sense of humor and the best science-fiction films have a brain. THE 
FIFTH ELEMENT has neither, and zero suspense. What it does 
have is a terrific visual style, outrageous art direction and a wide 
variety of people sporting a wild variety of costumes, proof movies 
are looking more and more like music videos. If only they'd fade out 
after four minutes...
        The first 15 minutes or so take place in Egypt, 1914, where 
an explorer has discovered some strange markings in a temple as 
Luke Perry looks on. A priest tries to stop the explorer from 
stumbling upon a cosmic secret, but too late. Down comes an alien 
spacecraft, out of which steps a strange bronze / chrome being that 
unlocks the entrance to a strange room. The brings out four small 
stone obelisks just as Luke shoots it. No, Luke, it's a friendly alien! 
Too late, the alien dies, after squeaking out a warning about the evil 
invading the earth 300 years from now.
        Flash forward, oh, 300 years or so. We meet Bruce Willis, 
a retired government agent who's now living out the mundane 
existence of a cab driver. In the first few scenes, we get the requisite 
world-of-the-future scenes. The bed makes itself, the microwave 
cooks food in a second, the cigarettes are four-fifths filter and the 
cars fly.
        Willis heads off in his cab as we cut to a secret government 
lab, where a group of scientists are examining the DNA of an 
armor-clad hand, the only remaining body part of an alien spacecraft 
that was shot down earlier in the day. They stick it in some futuristic 
chamber and reconstruct the entire being based on the DNA of the 
hand. After a few bright flashes we see a nude, orange-haired Milla 
Jovavich. One of the scientists makes the mistake of getting too 
close to the glass chamber, as Jovavich smashes the chamber and 
bashes his head in before jumping through the wall of the building.
        A chase ensues as she jumps from the building and right 
into -- as coincidence would have it -- Willis' cab. She's just 
beautiful enough that he risks his life outrunning the cops. Of 
course, she doesn't speak any English, so she can't tell him who she 
is or what she's running from. All she can say is the name of a 
priest, one in a long line of holymen who has been trained to protect 
the four stones. But we soon learn the stones were stolen by evil 
Zorg (Gary Oldman), who is working for the evil aliens that want to 
destroy the earth.
        Jovavich was sent by the good aliens to protect -- she is the 
fifth element. So the elements are earth, air, wind, fire and anorexic 
models? I can handle a universe like that. The weak writing shows 
through as the priest reminds Willis that she may have superhuman 
strength but she is also fragile. She needs his love to survive. 
Pathetic, as are the caricature portrayals by Oldman as the psycho 
villain and Chris Tucker as a flamboyant but frightened radio host 
who is thrust into the action two-thirds of the way into the movie.
        THE FIFTH ELEMENT has a few interesting elements. 
It's fun most of the time and always flashy, but it's also missing a lot. 
We don't care about the characters, there's no suspense and the plot 
is predictable and borrowed from hosts of other sci-fi flicks. If 
they're going to throw so much money at a movie, they should at 
least invest a few million in the creative end. The mise en scene is 
nice but it doesn't balance out the writing.
        The two-and-a-half star rating applies to the viewing 
experience I had -- huge screen, digital stereo sound. It was almost 
enough to make it seem good at times. Otherwise, the rating is 
knocked down by at least a half-star.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Author
Nick Schaden
    Making film in the science fiction genre is a risky proposal.  Not only
must a sci-fi movie hurdle over standard movie obstacles (acting,plot,etc.),
it also has to create a believable future that toys with both fantasy and
reality. "The Fifth Element" scores big in the latter, creating a movie with
dazzling special effects and costumes that would make Ridley Scott proud.
Unfortunately, a slightly muddy plot and other annoying quibbles keep this
film from achieving true sci-fi greatness.
    Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis) is a cabbie/ex-military hero living in
23rd century New York.   Naturally, he's the only man that can save the
world from total destruction by recovering the "fifth element" (a "perfect"
woman) and  several other assorted stones.   Sound a little fishy?   It is.
During the first third of "The Fifth Element", little makes completely
comprehensible sense, director Luc Besson rather decides to impress the
audience with high quality special effects.   While the effects and design
are likely this movie's strongest point, this reviewer wanted a bit more
substance than flair.
    Two other elements detract from the quality of this movie.   The first -
Bruce Willis.   While Willis acts adequately, unfortunately he sticks to his
rock hard "Die Hard"-like persona (complete with tough attitude and cute
one-liners) a bit too much.   In addition, this reviewer never cared for
Chris Tucker, who plays a rather large role in the final third of this film.
His constant barrage antics soon became much more annoying than humorous.
    Even with these problems, "The Fifth Element" remains ahead of the
sci-fi pack.  The special effects, costumes (Gary Oldman's strange outfit
comes to mind), and other elements make for a captivating and wonderfully
detailed future.   In addition, the humor throughout the film was quite
entertaining.
 In sum, while "The Fifth Element" is centuries away from being the next
"Blade Runner", it's an entertaining and solid film that is worth the price
of admission.
    *** Movies rated from -4 (worst) to +4 (best), 0=average movie ***

Author
David Hines
I have a very special place in my heart for the late Dorothy Parker.  
"Who the hell is Dorothy Parker, and why should we give a damn?" I 
hear the masses cry.  Mrs. Parker was a writer, fellas.  She was a 
pretty good one, in fact, although today she's best remembered for 
her doo-dad poetry.  There was a decent movie made about her life in 
the past year or two called _Mrs. Parker and the Vicious Circle_ -- 
oh, dammit, I shouldn't have said that, because now people will go 
rent the movie instead of going to the trouble of actually reading 
some of her work.  Go to the library, will you, folks?
Anyway, the reason I mention Mrs. Parker here is that she was also 
a reviewer of the highest caliber: that very rare thing, a *good* 
critic.  And in her review of A.A. Milne's play _Give Me Yesterday_ 
(in the _New Yorker_ of March 14, 1931) she describes how she coped 
with a particularly bad moment:
When I read that passage, I thought to myself: "What a terrific idea!"  
So I went to the movies this weekend with a .32 caliber revolver in a 
shoulder holster.  And a cyanide capsule hidden away in an extra tooth.  
And a Sinclair molecular chain in my shirt collar, and a .22 gun in my 
pocket for fun, and a razor in my shoe.  And, just in case, I took a 
tomato.  I'm allergic to tomatoes.
And then I sat down and watched _The Fifth Element_.
Thinking back on it now, I can't recall when I first attempted suicide 
during the film.  I think it was just after the opening credits, when 
the archaeologist Dr. Exposition explained that the universe was divided 
into Good Guys and Bad Guys, and that the Bad Guys, who come every five 
thousand years to attempt to destroy All Life, can only be defeated by 
people who combine the powers of Earth, Wind, Water, Fire, and... you 
guessed it, boyos, Heart, the eponymous Fifth Element.  When I realized 
Luc Besson was proudly presenting to us "Captain Planet: the Motion 
Picture," I pressed that .32 revolver to my head and pulled the trigger 
till the gun was empty.
Unfortunately, my aim is poor and I missed, and then the theater's 
emergency restraints kicked in and shackled my limbs and propped my eyes 
open -- and I was stuck, unable to get to my instruments of self-
destruction.  I resolved to use the cyanide tooth as a last resort, and 
screwed up my courage to watch the flick.
And if watching was all I'd been doing, I probably would have found it 
fairly enjoyable.  Visually, at least, _The Fifth Element_ is pretty 
cool.  As far as the writing and direction goes, it's trite, laughable, 
sub-moronic, pathetic, offensive, execrable, overdone, and dopey; it may 
induce vomiting, headache, dizziness, sterility, and hatred for almost 
everyone involved with the flick... but _The Fifth Element_ is a very 
pretty film.
But then again, _The Fifth Element_ cost ninety million dollars.
For that much money, it had better be pretty.  And it is; it really 
is.  Jean-Paul Gaultier did the costuming, which is very interesting to 
look at.  The sets are large and well-detailed, and effects are 
digitally composited with the sets to terrific effect.  The aliens are 
really alien-looking, which is nice, and although there are few 
different kinds of aliens, there are a *lot* of each species; the 
animatronics bill alone must have been sky-high.  The spaceships look 
good, and the flying cars are nothing short of flat-out terrific: 
beautiful individual design, and the multi-level traffic flow is a 
thing to behold.  I like to watch lots of things moving around, and 
the effects people on _The Fifth Element_ did some great work with 
that, especially in a great series of shots in which Bruce Willis's 
character drives his cab downwards through several layers of traffic.  
I also particularly liked the flying restaurant that makes door-to-
door (or rather, window-to-window) service.
Unfortunately, movie theaters don't come with mute buttons.
Visually, _The Fifth Element_ is tasty.  Its plot, dialogue, and 
direction, however, are utter crud.  Not only is it tripe, it is 
pretentious tripe.  It is an unceasing barrage of moronic cliches that 
were outdated when its star was still in utero.  It is offensive.  It 
is yecchy.  It shines, all right -- like a dead mackerel.  Squirming 
there, in the dark, I longed for _Independence Day_ -- yeah, ID was 
a dumb-as-rocks movie, but at least it was unpretentious.  _The Fifth 
Element_ is an example of the kind of crud that we can get when a 
movie director thinks he's some sort of artistic genius -- Besson is 
not, and his efforts to prove he is only hurt his film.  In vain 
efforts to prove his artistic merit, he piles symmetry on top of 
symmetry, cuts from one location to another several times in the 
course of scenes to track parallel conversations, sets the action of 
one scene to the soundtrack of another... and in the end, it's 
pointless.  The effect is more grotesque than effective: a plainitive 
cry of "Look, Ma, see how *nice* I'm directing!"  
And when I say grotesque, I mean it.  Besson's idea of humor is to 
give us a simpering, prancing, effeminate stereotype as a talk-show 
host, and to then juxtapose scenes of pre-flight and take-off of a 
spaceliner with scenes of the said fop's seduction and bringing to 
orgasm of a stewardess.  Nor is Besson content to limit his use of 
the nauseating beast to one scene; he has him prance and flounce and 
pout and lisp and whine his way through the rest of the film, and 
latch on to Bruce Willis's character to panic and roll his eyes and 
provide a little comic relief.  _The Celluloid Closet_ points out 
that one common Hollywood tool is to have bad things happen to people 
outside mainstream gender boundaries -- that is, they're there to flaunt 
themselves, to vex the audience's sense of propriety, and then give the 
audience joy by dying in nasty ways.
Does it say anything about the degree to which this creation annoys that 
I, who deplore both stereotypes and political correctness, was hoping 
Besson would kill him off and get it over with, instead of rubbing our 
noses in idiocy?  Does it say anything that I, an SF fan of impeccable 
taste, found the fop more annoying than _Star Trek: Voyager_'s 
Neelix?  Does it say anything that I, an MST3K fan who ordinarily would
welcome the opportunity to make jokes about Dennis Rodman getting his own 
talk show, curled up in pain and whimpered?  
The plot is laughable.  Really laughable.  The deal is that these Bad Guys 
come around again, and zap things, and will blow up earth if they're not 
stopped.  So the Good Guys have this weapon, right, in a temple in 
Egypt: combine the McGuffins, er, I mean, stones representing each 
element, open 'em, stick the Fifth Element in the center, and Captain 
Planet zaps the Bad Guys to kingdom come.
Only, see, the aliens who are Good Guys took the stones out of the temple 
for some damn reason.  So they have to get 'em back to Earth.  And the 
alien they send to tell people how to fix the situation gets scragged by 
some of the Bad Guys' lackeys before he lands.  So scientists clone him, 
and the clone turns out to be this chick Lee-Eluukulaniromanadvoratrelundar 
or some stuff like that, who goes by Lee-Eluu for short.  She's played by 
Milla Jovovich, who says she dedicated herself so seriously to the role 
that she even took the drastic step of giving up pot for the duration of 
filming -- which is ironic, because she looks like a junkie.  Anyway, 
Lee-Eluu, being no fan of confinement, escapes the unescapable cell in 
her Jean-Paul Gaultier bandage dress and takes a suicide plunge.  Only 
she doesn't die, see, 'cause there's this cabdriver, played by Bruce 
Willis, whose cab conveniently breaks her fall.  She doesn't speak 
English (hey, she's just a clone), but she speaks at ninety miles a 
minute in an alien language and reads English.  She convinces him to 
take her to this priest of a sect that understands her, and they find 
out the stones are on this far-off pleasure planet and they go there 
with the priest and this disk jockey and have to fight to get the stones.
Only there's this other guy Zorg, played by Gary Oldman, who wants the 
stones 'cause he's with the Bad Guys, for no reasons that make sense.  
Zorg says he's pro-chaos because it creates jobs, but the bad guys don't 
spread chaos; they just make people dead.  No potential for being an 
evil megabusinessman there.  But anyway, Zorg wants the stones, not
to mention the heads of Our Heroes.  And Zorg has a whole lot of ugly
lackeys, some of whom want to kill him too.  And Our Heroes fly around
and fight Zorg and his henchmen and listen to opera and have some wacky 
good times and kick butt until Lee-Eluu finds out about war and wonders 
whether humanity is really worth saving, but then Bruce Willis's 
character kisses her so she decides what the heck and stops the Bad Guys
from incinerating Earth.  He must be a good kisser.
You think that reads stupid?  Imagine what it's like *watching* it.
_The Fifth Element_ can't even beg off on the grounds of being 
intentionally low-brow, like _Independence Day_.  The flick is a 
wretched mixed bag that tries to be too many things -- and ultimately 
is none of them.  It's too trashy to be taken seriously, but too 
pretentious to be enjoyed as comic-book camp or as guilty pleasure.  
The stunning images, too, are a mish-mash, one that's almost entirely 
referential:  images, effects, and costumes are derived from from 
_Blade Runner_, _2001_, _Star Wars_, _Brazil_, you name it.  _The 
Fifth Element_ is an extravagant and ugly hodgepodge, a chimaera of 
skiffy films and 1930s pulps.  It is a patchwork quilt stitched by an 
idiot, full of light and color and signifying nothing.  It is a waste 
of ninety million smackers and of time and of talent and of however 
damn much you pay for a ticket.
My recommendation: don't waste your time.
Oh, and the cyanide tooth turned out to be defective, but after I got 
out of the movie, I did kill myself messily with about everything I had: 
the backup pistol, the razor blade, the Sinclair molecular chain.  But 
I'm saving the tomato.  

Author
Jeff Pidgeon
MORE "HEAVY METAL" THAN "HEAVY METAL"
        "The Fifth Element", the latest offering from Luc Bresson, the director
of "La Femme Nikita" and "The Professional", is a lavish-if-unfocused sci-fi
fantasy.  The basic idea is that there's Something Big and Nasty way out there
at The Edge of The Universe, and periodically it Comes Back to Earth to Cause
Problems that are Nicely Scored.  One alien race, a pleasantly lumbering bunch,
have been maintaining a device/weapon created to keep the SB&N at bay upon its
return.  The device uses the four alchemical elements plus a fifth -- a perfect
being, the supreme warrior -- to operate.  For some reason, this race removes
this device from Earth (the oncoming first World War seems to be a plausible
cause, but this was not made very clear if that was indeed the case), but prom-
ises to return it before the beginning of Act III.
        The main problem with this device is that if someone other than the 
true Fifth Element uses the device, they become Really Bad and More Powerful
than most villains.  Naturally, Gary Oldman -- or Jean-Baptiste Emmanuel Zorg
-- wants to do just that.  Working with him are a group of apparently free-    
lance mercenary aliens who can disguise themselves by morphing their frog-esque
heads into human heads.  Apparently, this is difficult -- whether the creatures
need to hold their breath or keep their concentration very focused is again un-
clear.  It read to me as the latter.
        Coming into this film, I expected that this monsterous "Stargate"-like
premise would involve Bruce Willis.  The Scruffy Cynic with the Shitty Job has
deep within him the perfection of the Fifth Element.  As it turns out, this is
not the case.  The craft, returning as promised, is attacked by Zorg's buddies
and destroyed.  Fortunately, enough remains that a clone can be made (in a tru-
ly impressive sequence), and our F.E. turns out to be a feral Milla Jovovich.
The current Earth military underestimates her prowess (insufficiently displayed
in my opinion, as compared to the assassin in "The Professional"), and she es-
capes.  Bruce saves her in his cab, and the two spend the remainder of the film
trying to get back to locate and operate the device, all the while evading 
Zorg's clutches.  This becomes easier as Zorg pisses off the Frog men rather
early in the film, and is forced to create most of his own obstacles to Bruce
and Milla's progress.  The Frog men are reduced to being an additional-one-    
might-say-extraneous obstacle.
        Over the running time of the film, Bruce and Milla are supposed to fall
in love and care for one another -- Milla's emotional development is crucial to
her effectiveness within the device's operation.  Bresson has never been good
at more than the most rudimentary character development, and this time the 
story needs it more than usual.  As a result, this aspect of the film is espec-
ially unsatisfying.  Additionally, the film's message comes across as "Love is
the greatest weapon of all", which struck me as a little odd.  Bresson's films
when they are working, resemble energetic comic books, while "Element" comes
off as a decent issue of "Heavy Metal" -- a simple story told in an extremely
elaborate, oblique way.  The storytelling seems especially fuzzy here -- my 
view of the plot is my impression gathered from the entire film, rather than a
series of clear points made in succession, each building upon the previous one.
        The main strength of "Heavy Metal" is in its graphic richness and the
technique of its execution, and "Element" shares both "Metal"'s strengths and
weaknesses.  Moebius is a design contributor to the film, and his unique look
can be seen and felt, particularly with the graphically snappy designs of the 
policemen's uniforms.  There are not a lot of narrative surprises, so it is 
left up to the visuals to compensate.  They aren't paticularly original -- as
usual, "Blade Runner"'s influence is heavily felt -- but they are entertaining
in their own right, and drew me through the film.  There are many entertaining
characters, but most have little to do of and importance (Ian Holm is paticu-
larly wasted).  For sheer audacity, Gary Oldman and Chris Tucker deserve the
top scenery-chewing awards.  Tucker plays a futuristic DJ character, a colli-
sion between Prince and Madonna, with such energy that you'll either laugh or
clutch your your temples.  I found him funny, but like many of "Element's"
charms, not well integrated into the story.  I'd like to see this again, mostly
to hum the sets and to see if I can bring the plot more into focus.  Otherwise,
if you're not interested in flying cars or Milla's midriff, you won't have 
much to do.  Recommended for art directors.

Author
Kevin Patterson
The Fifth Element (PG-13, 1997)
Directed by Luc Besson. Written by Luc Besson and Robert Mark Kamen.
Starring Bruce Willis, Milla Jovovich, Gary Oldman.
        After the hype for The Fifth Element,  I went expecting to see a
science fiction movie with a sophisticated story along the lines of, say,
Blade Runner  or 2001: A Space Odyssey.  That story may have been there, but
the movie didn't quite seem to deliver all of it. What it did deliver,
however, was a movie that took the conventions of sci-fi/action cinema to
their logical extremes, creating an entertaining atmosphere of non-stop mania.
        This actually worked very well for two reasons. First, the art
direction was excellent. The cartoonish, Terry Gilliam-esque visuals gave off
the impression that the film wasn't taking itself too seriously and that
perhaps we were supposed to believe that none of this was even real and
instead was taking place inside someone's deranged mind (such as, perhaps,
that of writer/director Luc Besson). Another review that described The Fifth
Element  as something like a "lunatic's dream" pretty much hit the nail on the head.
        Second, this sense of an interstellar roller-coaster was achieved not
just through lots of fights, chases, and explosions (though there were
certainly plenty of those), but also through some hilariously manic
characters. First and foremost was Leeloo (Milla Jovovich), an alien woman who
possesses the key to stopping an evil force poised to destroy the earth; as
the reincarnation of a Supreme Being, she speaks only the "ancient tongue." As
a result, she spends most of her time hysterically spouting gibberish (which
she does quite convincingly) and single-handedly beating the tar out of hordes
of alien mercenaries (hey, she's a Supreme Being, remember?). Also notable
were Chris Tucker as a talk-show host and Gary Oldman as a greedy warlord,
both of whose characters give new meaning to the word "flamboyant." Bruce
Willis, the hero of the story, strolls through all this in typically deadpan
fashion, delivering the usual wisecracks, blowing bad guys' heads off, and
generally kicking ass as needed.
        Another benefit to this approach is that it gives what is basically a
ludicrous story an odd kind of inner coherence. When watching the movie Speed,
 for example, I couldn't help but think that there wasn't really anything all
that special about the characters played by Keanu Reeves and Sandra Bullock
and that in reality they would have quickly lost control of the situation.
With The Fifth Element,  on the other hand, you get the feeling that if these
characters somehow actually existed (perhaps as a sort of practical joke on
the rest of us by one of Leeloo's Supreme Being cousins), they just might be
able to pull this off.
        Unfortunately, the story itself sometimes gets lost in the shuffle.
The bare-bones plot is fairly standard sci-fi: an evil force appears and seems
ready to destroy life on Earth, and some ancient artifacts as well as Leeloo's
supernatural powers are needed to defeat it. There were a few hints, however,
that there was really more to it than that, and that perhaps not everything in
Luc Besson's head quite made it to the screen. Similarly, the "moral lesson"
at the end of the movie, in which Leeloo becomes reluctant to save the human
race when she learns of its bloody history, seems kind of forced and
obligatory because not much time is devoted to it. The Fifth Element  is not,
then, the landmark sci-fi classic that some had predicted, but it is a
well-executed, generally clever, and wonderfully entertaining action-comedy
that is, if nothing else, worth the price of admission.

Author
John M. Bozeman
Trailers for the 5TH ELEMENT have made made people wonder:
is the movie going to be another crummy sci-fi big budget
bomb done by people who don't understand the genre?  Or may
it's the "Star Wars of the '90"?  
The answer to this is:  It is neither.  The best way that
I can describe it is to say it is like H. R. Giger did 
"Blade Runner."  And made it a comedy.  
A description of the plot doesn't really do the film 
justice.  Most of the film is set about 200 years in the
future. Bruce Willis plays a down and out
cab driver, who used to be a crack special forces military.
One day he happens across a beautiful space alien (actually,
she's a clone of one in human form--it's a little hard
to explain) who, due to a big misunderstanding, is running
from the police.  Fortunately, Willis has just been 
assigned to hunt down some alien artifacts needed to save
the world from a really evil fate.  The same one that the
alien is looking for for the same purpose.  Too bad that
the Bad Guys--actually, several sets of bad guys--
are also looking for them, too.  Mayhem of course
ensues.
The best thing that can be said about the movie is that
it deals with some pretty heavy subjects (the destruction
of the world by evil forces) in a light-hearted manner.
In a way slightly like "Die Hard" and/or "Lethal Weapon,"
serious topics and violence alternate with very funny
events.
Other important stuff:  the acting is pretty good.  Bruce Willis
does a good job, as does the (cloned) alien (played by Milla
Jovovich).  And the main bad guy, played by Gary Oldman,
is well-done--sinister, yet with a comic/ironic edge.  
The sound track is very interesting, and the art direction
and some costumes are outstanding.  And there are a few
parodies of somebody who seems suspiciously like an artist
formerly known as Prince.
The film runs (with trailers) about 2 1/2 hours, but doesn't
seem that long.  Finally,  I would note that the people I 
was there with seemed to enjoy the film at least as much
as myself.  

Author
The Flying Inkpot
Directed by: Luc Besson
Story by: Luc Besson
Written by: Luc Besson and Robert Mark Kamen
Cast: Bruce Willis, Milla Jovoich, Gary Oldman, and Ian Holm
Produced by: Columbia Pictures and Gaumont Productions
Running Time: 127 minutes
Rating : ** for narrative coherence, **** for sheer fun
It's hard to watch this film without thinking about the fact that 
it's the most expensive movie ever made. Not because it looks so cool 
(and yes, it does look really cool), but because it's just not worth 
it, and obviously so. Sure, it's a hell of a lot of fun, but then so 
is FARGO at a fraction of the cost of THE FIFTH ELEMENT. For the 
cost of this movie, you could make at least ten really good movies...
maybe even twenty or thirty.
The biggest problem with the movie is that it really doesn't make a lot
of sense. Besson's original story was much longer, maybe three or four
hundred pages, and in the process of cutting it down to affordable (!)
length, it has lost a lot of important information. Without reading
about the movie before seeing it, I would have been completely lost. So
anyway...
THE FIFTH ELEMENT, which takes place in the 23rd century, is about a New
York cabbie, Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis), who just happens to be a
former special forces agent (surprise!). Dallas gets involved in a
scenario in which a "dark force" is consuming all that is good in the
universe and can only be countered by the mysterious "Fifth Element".
And the Fifth Element just happens to be...an incredibly cute, spunky
girl (Milla Jovovich) with hair that looks like orange yarn and nipples
that are highly visible regardless of what she is wearing. Standing in
the way is Zorg (Gary Oldman, with the world's worst accent and
haircut), an evil guy who wants the four stones (oh yeah, forgot to
mention those...they are necessary for the Fifth Element to conquer the
dark force; don't ask, I don't understand it either) in order to give
them to the dark force (why?).
So they all end up on a resort ship in space, along with an offensively
stereotyped black disc jockey named Ruby Rhod (Chris Tucker), and all
hell breaks loose as the various characters seek the four stones (hidden
inside a blue opera singer from some other planet) before the dark force
consumes the universe. OK.
So the story make very little sense, but, as I said, it looks really
cool (lots of special effects and explosions), and it is unexpectedly
very funny. Unfortunately, it all seems so familiar. In fact, the film
reminds me very much of Total Recall (not Blade Runner, as Columbia and
Gaumont would have you believe), not just in the special effects but in
its sense of humor as well. Both share a macho main character in a
future world that is confusing to a real, hands-on type of guy who likes
to blow things up and hit people, as well.
This film is important only as an example of what can be done (and the
limits of what can be done) with a hell of a lot of money. It will not
go down in history as a great film, or even as another Star Wars or
Indiana Jones type film (you know, intellectually undemanding but
endearing for largely unexplainable reasons). But everybody's going to
go see it, so go ahead (and you MUST see it on the big screen). You
won't be overly dissapointed, but you won't be all that impressed,
either. Let's just hope that Besson doesn't get so much money for the
production of his next movie; maybe it will make more sense.
THE FLYING INKPOT's RATING SYSTEM:
* Wait for the video.
** A little creaky, but still better than staying at home with Gotcha!
*** Pretty good, bring a friend.
**** Amazing, potent stuff.
***** Perfection. See it twice.


Author
Mark R. Leeper
     I wonder if this is a postmodern science fiction movie?  If so I
am willing to go back to the Modern and start over from there.  THE
FIFTH ELEMENT is what you would get if you combined a plot from HEAVY
METAL comic magazine, the pacing of a Japanese anime film, and Terry
Gilliam visualizations.  It is a film that will probably have a cult
following while others will find it, as my wife put it, appallingly
bad.  France is known for modest art films, and director Luc Besson is
French, but he is a renegade with a style generally out of empty
Hollywood action films.  His previous films include LA FEMME NIKITA and
LEON (U.S.  title: THE PROFESSIONAL).  Here he has made a film with
perhaps the best art direction since BLADERUNNER and uses it to tell a
dim-witted pop-sci-fi story.  Besson, who also co-authored the
screenplay, realized that a good plot might be hard to follow for some.
He simulates the same effect by having a bad plot that just has a lot
of stupid things happening very, very fast.
     The Ultimate Evil comes visiting our solar system every 5000 years
in the form of a huge glowing sphere that for some unexplained reason
is trying to destroy the Earth.  I guess that is just what huge glowing
spheres do.  With the help of some strange aliens and with four mystic
stones we Earth people have been able to fend off the evil in the past.
In 1914 the friendly aliens took the stones away for safekeeping.
Previously they had been guarded by a long line of priests.  The
priests still know what do to about the coming evil, but no longer have
the stones they need.  Our main story is set early in the 23rd Century.
The Evil is returning.  There are forces of Good trying to stop the end
of the world and forces of Evil trying to steal the stones.  The leader
of the evil forces is an industrialist named Zorg, played by Gary
Oldman.  Just what Zorg hopes to gain by letting his planet be
destroyed, if it is his planet, is left as a loose end.  I guess
stealing mystic symbols is just what evil industrialists do.  One of
the good aliens is killed and cloned, but in cloned form seems to be a
beautiful woman, Milla Jovovich as Le-Eluu.  She is terrified of the
humans who have cloned her and she takes a swan dive off a skyscraper
(all buildings seem to be skyscrapers in the 23rd Century) and lands in
the floating taxicab of Korben (Bruce Willis).  This pulls Korben into
the action and starts him on the quest for the four elemental stones.
     Bruce Willis is in the lead and--as he seems to have wanted to
show people with IN COUNTRY--he can act.  He just chooses not to push
himself much beyond the limited roles he has been playing.  Of somewhat
more interest is Milla Jovovich.  Though much of the film she must
speak a nonsense language--actually it sounds a lot like Italian--and
makes it sound very natural.  This is not generally considered an
important acting skill, but here it was what was what was required and
she does a very credible job.  Gary Oldman at one time seemed to be the
Robert Duvall of his generation.  He would do well to stay away from
Luc Besson films since this is the second film in which Besson has been
able to coax from Oldman his very worst and most exaggerated
performances.  His performance here is at best just not notable, and
that is really unusual for an otherwise very good actor.  Ian Holm
plays a priest of the line entrusted with alien secrets.  Like Oldman,
he has done better acting jobs and perhaps their efforts are
exaggerated intentionally by Besson so nobody misses the point that
this film is not intended to be taken entirely seriously.
     This film had the budget, the art direction, the special effects,
and the cast to make a much better film.  One has the feeling that
Besson is really talking down to his audiences and laughing up his
sleeve.  There are moments in this film that show what it could have
been, but unfortunately it was no more than it was.  This is a film
that might be better to watch with the sound off.  I rate it a low 0 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Drew McWeeny
        This marks my first posting to this newsgroup, and I felt it was
time to weigh in on a film that has drawn fairly hotly divided response
so far.  Also, just to correct a statement made in the Flying Inkpot
review of the same film, this is in no way, shape, form, or fashion the
"most expensive movie ever made."  Even if it were, only a moron would
think that the budget of a film is the criteria on which to judge it. 
If it doesn't affect your ticket price, and no one was coereced into
spending the money, then what the hell does a budget matter?
        At first, the opening of the film seems odd, comic in an almost
old-fashioned way.  The doddering old archaeologist, the sleepy little
boy, the dashing American artist, sketching it all.  Even the threat
that's introduced (a treacherous priest, a shot of poison) is
old-fashioned.  Like Spielberg's classic RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, this
film's opening has a warm, old Hollywood glow about it...
        The robots that climb out of the ship are ominous, threatening,
black and metal, with odd angles and dangerous looking attachments.
They're truly bizarre, and scare all hell out of everyone on the scene,
as well they should.  They arrive, and collect four stones, opening a
secret chamber to do so.  One of the humans, understandably upset by
this, opens fire on one of the robots, and we gear up for an action
scene in which these menacing metal warriors kick into high gear,
tearing up everything and everyone in sight.  But, for some reason...
they don't.  There's no firefight.  The action beat we're all primed for
from our years of immersion in the rhythms of "event" movies never
comes.  And that's the first clue that we're in for something a little
different with Luc Besson's triumphant, if somewhat flawed, new SF epic,
THE FIFTH ELEMENT.
        Having seen the film three times now, I can honestly say that I
have finally "seen" the film.  This is one of the most densely detailed
pictures I've seen in quite a while, and it's a deserving entry into the
pantheon of classic cinema works of imagination.  Although I think I
still prefer Besson's LEON to this new film, I was sufficiently dazzled
to hail the film for what it is.  It's an original vision of the future,
and it's a richly imagined world into which the audience is invited.
        It was Einstein who said, "God is in the details," speaking of
the Universe at large.  In the world of SF cinema, details are just as
crucial.  An audience will only believe in a new world if the filmmaker
commits to making it feel as real as possible.  Audiences are willing to
suspend disbelief if the actors and the filmmakers give it their all,
really committing to this other place.  Mark Hammill may not be a great
actor (having just seen the SW Trilogy on the big screen again, I'm less
infatuated with him than ever in the first film), but he does have a
gift that made him right for those films.  He looked like he lived in
that world.  The way he used the props, the familiarity with it all, the
sheer mundanity he managed to convey all sold that reality.  We believe
because he believes.
        Besson has managed to do that here in fits and starts, and when
it works, it's transporting.  The New York that Bruce Willis' Corbin
Dallas lives and works in is a crowded, noisy metropolis that feels
totally familar and wildly exotic all at once.  It's the sheer volume of
air traffic that sells the illusion, the vision of a world grown up,
where there's not a wasted bit of space.  Besson doesn't just show his
city off, though.  In fact, he really doesn't show it to us until it
makes sense to.  There's no masturbatory establishing shots up front, no
long boring pans across the city for no reason other than to show off
the design.  It's only when the action mandates we see the city that
Besson finally shows it to us.  It's worth the wait, too.  Digital
Domain deserves an Oscar nomination for their work here, and the early
images from TITANIC suggest another one would be due for that.  There's
a wonderful texture to Besson's vision of the city, and the fact that
it's so colorful and so alive is seductive.  It's not the urban hell of
BLADE RUNNER.  People would still live in this New York.  There's still
things to enjoy here.  In fact, if I have a complaint, it's that we
don't get to spend enough time on Earth before leaving.
        And leave we do.  We get to go on a jaunt to the far edge of
explored space, where warships face down a big glowing ball of Evil,
which seems to be named Mr. Shadow.  We also get to go on a cruise
around another planet, onboard a cosmic LOVE BOAT that features a
perfect recreation of the London Opera House, where an alien diva gives
a transcendent performance in one of the film's most bravura sequences,
a marvel of cross-cutting, with a perfect blend of sound and image.
        The film ends where it begins, back in Egypt, back in that
secret room, with the rocks returning from their journey.  It's not a
terribly surprising ending, but it's a moving one in many ways.  There's
not the same kind of shoot-'em-up climax that we've come to expect.  In
fact, the film's bad guys all sort of take each other out, way before
the film ends.  The threat is dealt with summarily, and is out of the
way before we have a chance to really be threatened by it.  The film's
weak link is dramatic tension.  Besson, whose LE FEMME NIKITA and LEON
are both slow fuse firecracker suspense pictures, never really gets us
suitably worried over whether or not the rocks will be retrieved.  In
fact, refreshingly, the good guys stay about two steps ahead of evil the
whole way through the film.  For once, Good doesn't mean stupid.  That's
going to frustrate a lot of American audiences.  Willis is not the hero
we're used to, and it's made all the more strange by the fact that it's
Bruce "DIE HARD" Willis we're looking at.  This movie's as big a
departure for him as PULP FICTION was, no matter how much Columbia tries
to sell this as an action film.  It's not.  It's a journey, with some
action here and there along the way.  For the most part, Dallas is a
reactor, the eyes through which we see these events unfold.
        Overall, the performances in this film are a grab bag.  Some
great, some good, some nearly unwatchable.  But the picture is richer
for the risks it takes.  Milla Jovovich, who's appeared to far less
advantage in DAZED & CONFUSED and RETURN TO THE BLUE LAGOON, is
marvellous here, brilliant and moving and funny and sexy.  The divine
language she speaks at the beginning of the movie, a bizarre babble
that's indecipherable, is spoken by her with complete conviction, and
her quicksilver emotional reactions, ever shifting, are surprisingly
well communicated, considering we can't understand her at all.  She's
"born" in a cloning chamber in a great early scene, using a hand
retrieved from a spaceship wreck, and escapes, dragging Willis into all
this.  She's the driving force of the film, and if Leeloo (her
character) doesn't work, then neither does the movie.  The person I saw
the film with hated the movie, but really liked her work anyway, and I'm
predicting she's a major star following this.  She easily outdistances
the much-overpraised Liv Tyler, who's never had a role half this good.
        Ian Holm is very good, but not especially differenct than he is
in most films.  He's got this bumbling semi-confused character down
cold, just as Brion James could play the grizzled, never fully
identified military figure who brings Willis back into the fold for one
last mission in his sleep.  Willis will be accused by many of
sleepwalking through this role, but I disagree.  I think there's a real
laconic ease that he's mastered, and he imbibes Dallas with an
unshakable quality that really works for the role.  There's a sense of
humor to this guy, but it's not all cheap one-liners (the real downfall
of Akiva Goldsman's BATMAN & ROBIN script).  The audience can laugh with
him, not at him.  It's a shame Besson keeps returning to one of the
film's truly awful ideas, Willis' mother, who only exists as a voice on
the phone.  She's the stereotypical nagging mother, and pales in
comparison to such maternal monsters as Katherine Helmond's Mrs. Lowry
in BRAZIL.
        Chris Tucker, who was so good in FRIDAY and DEAD PRESIDENTS, may
have committed career suicide with his work here.  He plays Ruby Red, a
ultra-flamboyant radio show host who accompanies prize winner Willis on
a cruise around that foreign planet.  There is really no way to describe
the work he turns in.  It's like Little Richard crossed with Nicolas
Cage in VAMPIRE'S KISS and PEGGY SUE GOT MARRIED.  It's so far out there
that you've either got to give in to it, or it will ruin the movie for
you.  I finally gave in, although I found it grating at times.  I
commend him for being so game, and for taking the chance.  When (and if)
he does work again, it's a safe bet it will be in something far more
down to earth than this.
        Gary Oldman, on the other hand, has officially become the
world's most dangerous actor.  Nicolas Cage traded the title in when he
started taking roles in THE ROCK, CON AIR, FACE/OFF, and SUPERMAN.  He's
sold out, and hard (I liked FACE/OFF, though, so I'm not complaining
that much), leaving Oldman to proceed unchallenged.  He plays Zorg, an
arms dealer with a thick Southern accent, bizarre plastic hair, and a
wicked limp.  He also happens to have a simply hysterical gun,
introduced in a wonderful scene that recalls all the James Bond/Q
sequences, but bigger.  There are rumors that there's a sequel to this
film already written and ready to shoot (actually, just the other half
of the original 400-plus page script) called MR. SHADOW.  If that's
true, then I'm sorry they killed Oldman's Zorg, who was a great foppish
foil, a long slow fuse that never really got to go off with full force.
        If you look quickly, there are a number of noteworthy faces that
pass by.  Bad boy French filmmaker Matthieu Kassovitz (LA HAINE) tries
to rob Willis early on in a funny little moment that goes nowhere, like
so many of the film's asides.  Trip-hop/DJ artist Tricky plays a fairly
inconsequential role as one of Oldman's henchmen.  Lee Evans, an
astonishing physical comedian whose gifts were the highlight of Peter
Chesholm's FUNNY BONES, is used to slight effect as a crew member aboard
that luxury space cruiser.  Some of the quirky casting falls flat,
though, with Tiny Lister's turn as The President most notably never
coming together.
        To sum up, this is a flawed picture, but its flaws only point up
what's good about the piece.  Besson will no doubt stump many people,
even those already familiar with his work.  For audiences willing to
meet him halfway, though, this is an aural/visual feast with an all-new
sensibility.

Author
David Wilcock
The film Luc Besson had been wanting to make for ages is finally here.
And, its good fun! This film wa poorly recieved in America, with many
people saying that it was just 'rubbish.' But I found it enjoyable,
cheesy rubbish.  The film is knows it is cheesy, and never takes itself
seriously, which is what saves this film. If the film was serious the
whole way through, this would of been one of the worst films of 1997.
Willis plays a cab driver in the future, who is just driving along
until a young woman smashes through the roof. She turns out to be the
'fifth    element', who will save the earth from a planet heading
straight for it. However, they must stop Oldman from getting the her,
otherwise the whole world will be destroyed! Cheesy, eh?  But the film
makes up for its dreadful plot, with it sense of humour, and its very
good speacial    effects. Some of the effects are incredible. Willis
gives his usual 'John Maclane' performance, Oldman is just crazy, and
there is a D.J later on who did nothing but annoy me. But, generally,
the peformances are very good.
Overall, then, I found this film very enjoyable sci-fi hokum.
Recommended.
